Selected Works of Mao Tse-tung



ON PROTRACTED WAR


_May 1938_

[_This series of lectures was delivered by Comrade Mao Tse-tung from May
26 to June 3, 1938, at the Yenan Association for the Study of the War of
Resistance Against Japan._]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

STATEMENT OF THE PROBLEM

1. It will soon be July 7, the first anniversary of the great War of
Resistance Against Japan. Rallying in unity, persevering in resistance
and persevering in the united front, the forces of the whole nation have
been valiantly fighting the enemy for almost a year. The people of the
whole world are attentively following this war, which has no precedent
in the history of the East, and which will go down as a great war in
world history too. Every Chinese suffering from the disasters of the war
and fighting for the survival of his nation daily yearns for victory.
But what actually will be the course of the war? Can we win? Can we win
quickly? Many people are talking about a protracted war, but why is it a
protracted war? How to carry on a protracted war? Many people are
talking about Final victory, but why will final victory be ours? How
shall we strive for final victory? Not everyone has found answers to
these questions; in fact, to this day most people have not done so.
Therefore the defeatist exponents of the theory of national subjugation
have come forward to tell people that China will be subjugated, that
final victory will not be China's. On the other hand, some impetuous
friends have come forward to tell people that China will win very
quickly without having to exert any great effort. But are these views
correct? We have said all along they are not. However, most people have
not yet grasped what we have been saying. This is partly because we did
not do enough propaganda and explanatory work, and partly because the
development of objective events had not yet fully and clearly revealed
their inherent nature and their features to the people, who were thus
not in a position to foresee the over-all trend and the outcome and
hence to decide on a complete set of policies and tactics. Now things
are better, the experience of ten months of war has been quite
sufficient to explode the utterly baseless theory of national
subjugation and to dissuade our impetuous friends from their theory of
quick victory. In these circumstances many people are asking for a
comprehensive explanation. All the more so with regard to protracted
war, not only because of the opposing theories of national subjugation
and quick victory but also because of the shallow understanding of its
nature. "Our four hundred million people have been making a concerted
effort since the Lukouchiao Incident, and the final victory will belong
to China." This formula has a wide currency. It is a correct formula but
needs to be given more content. Our perseverance in the War of
Resistance and in the united front has been possible because of many
factors. Internally, they comprise all the political parties in the
country from the Communist Party to the Kuomintang, all the people from
the workers and peasants to the bourgeoisie, and all the armed forces
from the regular forces to the guerrillas; internationally, they range
from the land of socialism to justice-loving people in all countries; in
the camp of the enemy, they range from those people in Japan who are
against the war to those Japanese soldiers at the front who are against
the war. In short, all these forces have contributed in varying degrees
to our War of Resistance. Every man with a conscience should salute
them. We Communists, together with all the other ant-Japanese political
parties and the whole people, have no other course than to strive to
unite all forces for the defeat of the diabolical Japanese aggressors.
July 1 this year will be the 17^(th) anniversary of the founding of the
Communist Party of China. A serious study of protracted war is necessary
in order to enable every Communist to play a better and greater part in
the War of Resistance. Therefore my lectures will be devoted to such a
study. I shall try to speak on all the problems relevant to the
protracted war, but I cannot possibly go into everything in one series
of lectures.

2. All the experience of the ten months of war proves the error both of
the theory of China's inevitable subjugation and of the theory of
China's quick victory. The former gives rise to the tendency to
compromise and the latter to the tendency to underestimate the enemy.
Both approaches to the problem are subjective and one-sided, or, in a
word, unscientific.

3. Before the War of Resistance, there was a great deal of talk about
national subjugation. Some said, "China is inferior in arms and is bound
to lose in a war." Others said, "If China offers armed resistance, she
is sure to become another Abyssinia." Since the beginning of the war,
open talk of national subjugation has disappeared, but secret talk, and
quite a lot of it too, still continues. For instance, from time to time
an atmosphere of compromise arises and the advocates of compromise argue
that "the continuance of the war spells subjugation".[1] In a letter
from Hunan a student has written:

In the countryside everything seems difficult. Doing propaganda work on
my own, I have to talk to people when and where I find them. The people
I have talked to are by no means ignoramuses; they all have some
understanding of what is going on and are very interested in what I have
to say. But when I run into my own relatives, they always say: "China
cannot win; she is doomed." They make one sick ! Fortunately, they do
not go around spreading their views, otherwise things would really be
bad. The peasants would naturally put more stock in what they say.

Such exponents of the theory of China's inevitable subjugation form the
social basis of the tendency to compromise. They are to be found
everywhere in China, and therefore the problem of compromise is liable
to crop up within the anti-Japanese front at any time and will probably
remain with us right until the end of the war. Now that Hsuchow has
fallen and Wuhan is in danger, it will not be unprofitable, I think, to
knock the bottom out of the theory of national subjugation.

4. During these ten months of war all kinds of views which are
indicative of impetuosity have also appeared. For instance, at the
outset of the war many people were groundlessly optimistic,
underestimating Japan and even believing that the Japanese could not get
as far as Shansi. Some belittled the strategic role of guerrilla warfare
in the War of Resistance and doubted the proposition, "With regard to
the whole, mobile warfare is primary and guerrilla warfare
supplementary; with regard to the parts, guerrilla warfare is primary
and mobile warfare supplementary." They disagreed with the Eighth Route
Army's strategy, "Guerrilla warfare is basic, but lose no chance for
mobile warfare under favourable conditions", which they regarded as a
"mechanical" approach.[2] During the battle of Shanghai some people
said: "If we can fight for just three months, the international
situation is bound to change, the Soviet Union is bound to send troops,
and the war will be over." They pinned their hopes for the future of the
War of Resistance chiefly on foreign aid.[3] After the Taierhchuang
victory,[4] some people maintained that the Hsuchow campaign should be
fought as a "quasi-decisive campaign" and that the policy of protracted
war should be changed. They said such things as, "This campaign marks
the last desperate struggle of the enemy," or, "If we win, the Japanese
warlords will be demoralized and able only to await their Day of
Judgement."[5] The victory at Pinghsingkuan turned some people's heads,
and further victory at Taierhchuang has turned more people's heads.
Doubts have arisen as to whether the enemy will attack Wuhan. Many
people think "probably not", and many others "definitely not". Such
doubts may affect all major issues. For instance, is our anti-Japanese
strength already sufficient? Some people may answer affirmatively, for
our present strength is already sufficient to check the enemy's advance,
so why increase it? Or, for instance, is the slogan "Consolidate and
expand the Anti-Japanese National United Front" still correct? Some
people may answer negatively, for the united front in its present state
is already strong enough to repulse the enemy, so why consolidate and
expand it? Or, for instance, should our efforts in diplomacy and
international propaganda be intensified? Here again the answer may be in
the negative. Or, for instance, should we proceed in earnest to reform
the army system and the system of government, develop the mass movement,
enforce education for national defence, suppress traitors and
Trotskyites, develop war industries and improve the people's livelihood?
Or, for instance, are the slogans calling for the defence of Wuhan, of
Canton and of the Northwest and for the vigorous development of
guerrilla warfare in the enemy's rear still correct? The answers might
all be in the negative. There are even some people who, the moment a
slightly favourable turn occurs in the war situation, are prepared to
intensify the "friction" between the Kuomintang and the Communist Party,
diverting attention from external to internal matters. This almost
invariably occurs whenever a comparatively big battle is won or the
enemy's advance comes to a temporary halt. All the above can be termed
political and military short-sightedness. Such talk, however plausible,
is actually specious and groundless. To sweep away such verbiage should
help the victorious prosecution of the War of Resistance.

5. The question now is: Will China be subjugated? The answer is, No, she
will not be subjugated, but will win final victory. Can China win
quickly? The answer is, No, she cannot win quickly, and the War of
Resistance will be a protracted war.

6. As early as two years ago, we broadly indicated the main arguments on
these questions. On July 16, 1936, five months before the Sian Incident
and twelve months before the Lukouchiao Incident, in an interview with
the American correspondent, Mr. Edgar Snow, I made a general estimate of
the situation with regard to war between China and Japan and advanced
various principles for winning victory. The following excerpts may serve
as a reminder:

_Question:_ Under what conditions do you think China can defeat and
destroy the forces of Japan?

_Answer:_ Three conditions are required: first, the establishment of an
anti-Japanese united front in China; second, the formation of an
international anti-Japanese united front; third, the rise of the
revolutionary movement of the people in Japan and the Japanese colonies.
From the standpoint of the Chinese people, the unity of the people of
China is the most important of the three conditions.

_Question:_ How long do you think such a war would last?

_Answer:_ That depends on the strength of China's anti-Japanese united
front and many other conditioning factors involving China and Japan.
That is to say, apart from China's own strength, which is the main
thing, international help to China and the help rendered by the
revolution in Japan are also important. If China's anti-Japanese united
front is greatly expanded and effectively organized horizontally and
vertically, if the necessary help is given to China by those governments
and peoples which recognize the Japanese imperialist menace to their own
interests and if revolution comes quickly in Japan, the war will
speedily be brought to an end and China will speedily win victory. If
these conditions are not realized quickly, the war will be prolonged.
But in the end, just the same, Japan will certainly be defeated and
China will certainly be victorious. Only the sacrifices will be great
and there will be a very painful period.

_Question:_ What is your opinion of the probable course of development
of such a war, politically and militarily?

_Answer:_ Japan's continental policy is already fixed, and those who
think they can halt the Japanese advance by making compromises with
Japan at the expense of more Chinese territory and sovereign rights are
indulging in mere fantasy. We definitely know that the lower Yangtse
valley and our southern seaports are already included in the continental
programme of Japanese imperialism. Moreover, Japan wants to occupy the
Philippines, Siam, Indo-China, the Malay Peninsula and the Dutch East
Indies in order to cut off other countries from China and monopolize the
southwestern Pacific. This is Japan's maritime policy. In such a period,
China will undoubtedly be in an extremely difficult position. But the
majority of the Chinese people believe that such difficulties can be
overcome; only the rich in the big port cities are defeatists because
they are afraid of losing their property. Many people think it would be
impossible for China to continue the war, once her coastline is
blockaded by Japan. This is nonsense. To refute them we need only cite
the war history of the Red Army. In the present War of Resistance
Against Japan, China's position is much superior to that of the Red Army
in the civil war. China is a vast country, and even if Japan should
succeed in occupying a section of China with as many as 100 to 200
million people, we would still be far from defeated. We would still have
ample strength to fight against Japan, while the Japanese would have to
fight defensive battles in their rear throughout the war. The
heterogeneity and uneven development of China's economy are rather
advantageous in the war of resistance. For example, to sever Shanghai
from the rest of China would definitely not be as disastrous to China as
would be the severance of New York from the rest of the United States.
Even if Japan blockades the Chinese coastline, it is impossible for her
to blockade China's Northwest, Southwest and West. Thus, once more the
central point of the problem is the unity of the entire Chinese people
and the building up of a nation-wide anti-Japanese front. This is what
we have long been advocating.

_Question:_ If the war drags on for a long time and Japan is not
completely defeated, would the Communist Party agree to the negotiation
of a peace with Japan and recognize her rule in northeastern China?

_Answer:_ No. Like the people of the whole country, the Chinese
Communist Party will not allow Japan to retain an inch of Chinese
territory.

_Question:_ What, in your opinion, should be the main strategy and
tactics to be followed in this "war of liberation"?

_Answer:_ Our strategy should be to employ our main forces to operate
over an extended and fluid front. To achieve success, the Chinese troops
must conduct their warfare with a high degree of mobility on extensive
battlefields, making swift advances and withdrawals, swift
concentrations and dispersals. This means large-scale mobile warfare,
and not positional warfare depending exclusively on defence works with
deep trenches, high fortresses and successive rows of defensive
positions. It does not mean the abandonment of all the vital strategic
points, which should be defended by positional warfare as long as
profitable. But the pivotal strategy must be mobile warfare. Positional
warfare is also necessary, but strategically it is auxiliary and
secondary. Geographically the theatre of the war is so vast that it is
possible for us to conduct mobile warfare most effectively. In the face
of the vigorous actions of our forces, the Japanese army will have to be
cautious. Its war-machine is ponderous and slow-moving, with limited
efficiency. If we concentrate our forces on a narrow front for a
defensive war of attrition, we would be throwing away the advantages of
our geography and economic organization and repeating the mistake of
Abyssinia. In the early period of the war, we must avoid any major
decisive battles, and must first employ mobile warfare gradually to
break the morale and combat effectiveness of the enemy troops.

Besides employing trained armies to carry on mobile warfare, we must
organize great numbers of guerrilla units among the peasants. One should
know that the anti-Japanese volunteer units in the three northeastern
provinces are only a minor demonstration of the latent power of
resistance that can be mobilized from the peasants of the whole country.
The Chinese peasants have very great latent power; properly organized
and directed, they can keep the Japanese army busy twenty-four hours a
day and worry it to death. It must be remembered that the war will be
fought in China, that is to say, the Japanese army will be entirely
surrounded by the hostile Chinese people, it will be forced to move in
all its provisions and guard them, it must use large numbers of troops
to protect its lines of communications and constantly guard against
attacks and it needs large forces to garrison Manchuria and Japan as
well.

In the course of the war, China will be able to capture many Japanese
soldiers and seize many weapons and munitions with which to arm herself;
at the same time China will win foreign aid to reinforce the equipment
of her troops gradually. Therefore China will be able to conduct
positional warfare in the latter period of the war and make positional
attacks on the Japanese-occupied areas. Thus Japan's economy will crack
under the strain of China's long resistance and the morale of the
Japanese forces will break under the trial of innumerable battles. On
the Chinese side, however, the growing latent power of resistance will
be constantly brought into play and large numbers of revolutionary
people will be pouring into the front lines to fight for their freedom.
The combination of all these and other factors will enable us to make
the final and decisive attacks on the fortifications and bases in the
Japanese-occupied areas and drive the Japanese forces of aggression out
of China.

The above views have been proved correct in the light of the experience
of the ten months of war and will also be borne out in the future.

7. As far back as August 25, 1937, less than two months after the
Lukouchiao Incident, the Central Committee of the Chinese Communist
Party clearly pointed out in its "Resolution on the Present Situation
and the Tasks of the Party":

The military provocation by the Japanese aggressors at Lukouchiao and
their occupation of Peiping and Tientsin represent only the beginning of
their large-scale invasion of China south of the Great Wall. They have
already begun their national mobilization for war. Their propaganda that
they have "no desire to aggravate the situation" is only a smokescreen
for further attacks.

The resistance at Lukouchiao on July 7 marked the starting point of
China's national War of Resistance.

Thus a new stage has opened in China's political situation, the stage of
actual resistance. The stage of preparation for resistance is over. In
the present stage the central task is to mobilize all the nation's
forces for victory in the War of Resistance.

The key to victory in the war now lies in developing the resistance that
has already begun into a war of total resistance by the whole nation.
Only through such a war of total resistance can final victory be won.

The existence of serious weaknesses in the War of Resistance may lead to
many setbacks, retreats, internal splits, betrayals, temporary and
partial compromises and other such reverses. Therefore it should be
realized that the war will be an arduous and protracted war. But we are
confident that, through the efforts of our Party and the whole people,
the resistance already started will sweep aside all obstacles and
continue to advance and develop.

The above thesis, too, has been proved correct in the light of the
experience of the ten months of war and will also be borne out in the
future.

8. Epistemologically speaking, the source of all erroneous views on war
lies in idealist and mechanistic tendencies on the question. People with
such tendencies are subjective and one-sided in their approach to
problems. They either indulge in groundless and purely subjective talk,
or, basing themselves upon a single aspect or a temporary manifestation,
magnify it with similar subjectivity into the whole of the problem. But
there are two categories of erroneous views, one comprising fundamental,
and therefore consistent, errors which are hard to correct, and the
other comprising accidental, and therefore temporary, errors which are
easy to correct. Since both are wrong, both need to be corrected.
Therefore, only by opposing idealist and mechanistic tendencies and
taking an objective and all-sided view in making a study of war can we
draw correct conclusions on the question of war.

THE BASIS OF THE PROBLEM

9. Why is the War of Resistance Against Japan a protracted war? Why will
the final victory be China's? What is the basis for these statements?

The war between China and Japan is not just any war, it is specifically
a war of life and death between semi-colonial and semi-feudal China and
imperialist Japan, fought in the Nineteen Thirties. Herein lies the
basis of the whole problem. The two sides in the war have many
contrasting features, which will be considered in turn below.

10_. The Japanese side._ First, Japan is a powerful imperialist country,
which ranks first in the East in military, economic and
political-organizational power, and is one of the five or six foremost
imperialist countries of the world. These are the basic factors in
Japan's war of aggression. The inevitability of the war and the
impossibility of quick victory for China are due to Japan's imperialist
system and her great military, economic and political-organizational
power. Secondly, however, the imperialist character of Japan's social
economy determines the imperialist character of her war, a war that is
retrogressive and barbarous. In the Nineteen Thirties, the internal and
external contradictions of Japanese imperialism have driven her not only
to embark on an adventurist war unparalleled in scale but also to
approach her final collapse. In terms of social development, Japan is no
longer a thriving country; the war will not lead to the prosperity
sought by her ruling classes but to the very reverse, the doom of
Japanese imperialism. This is what we mean by the retrogressive nature
of Japan's war. It is this reactionary quality, coupled with the
military-feudal character of Japanese imperialism, that gives rise to
the peculiar barbarity of Japan's war. All of which will arouse to the
utmost the class antagonisms within Japan, the antagonism between the
Japanese and the Chinese nations, and the antagonism between Japan and
most other countries of the world. The reactionary and barbarous
character of Japan's war constitutes the primary reason for her
inevitable defeat. Thirdly, Japan's war is conducted on the basis of her
great military, economic and political-organizational power, but at the
same time it rests on an inadequate natural endowment. Japan's military,
economic and political-organizational power is great but quantitatively
inadequate. Japan is a comparatively small country, deficient in
manpower and in military, financial and material resources, and she
cannot stand a long war. Japan's rulers are endeavouring to resolve this
difficulty through war, but again they will get the very reverse of what
they desire; that is to say, the war they have launched to resolve this
difficulty will eventually aggravate it and even exhaust Japan's
original resources. Fourthly and lastly, while Japan can get
international support from the fascist countries, the international
opposition she is bound to encounter will be greater than her
international support. This opposition will gradually grow and
eventually not only cancel out the support but even bear down upon Japan
herself. Such is the law that an unjust cause finds meagre support, and
such is the consequence of the very nature of Japan's war. To sum up,
Japan's advantage lies in her great capacity to wage war, and her
disadvantages lie in the reactionary and barbarous nature of her war, in
the inadequacy of her manpower and material resources, and in her meagre
international support. These are the characteristics on the Japanese
side.

11. _The Chinese side._ First, we are a semi-colonial and semi-feudal
country. The Opium War, [6] the Taiping Revolution, [7] the Reform
Movement of 1898, [8] the Revolution of 1911 [9] and the Northern
Expedition [10]--the revolutionary or reform movements which aimed at
extricating China from her semi-colonial and semi-feudal state--all met
with serious setbacks, and China remains a semi-colonial and semi-feudal
country. We are still a weak country and manifestly inferior to the
enemy in military, economic and political-organizational power. Here
again one can find the basis for the inevitability of the war and the
impossibility of quick victory for China. Secondly, however, China's
liberation movement, with its cumulative development over the last
hundred years, is now different from that of any previous period.
Although the domestic and foreign forces opposing it have caused it
serious setbacks, at the same time they have tempered the Chinese
people. Although China today is not so strong as Japan militarily,
economically, politically and culturally, yet there are factors in China
more progressive than in any other period of her history. The Communist
Party of China and the army under its leadership represent these
progressive factors. It is on the basis of this progress that China's
present war of liberation can be protracted and can achieve final
victory. By contrast with Japanese imperialism, which is declining,
China is a country rising like the morning sun. China's war is
progressive, hence its just character. Because it is a just war, it is
capable of arousing the nation to unity, of evoking the sympathy of the
people in Japan and of winning the support of most countries in the
world. Thirdly, and again by contrast with Japan, China is a very big
country with vast territory, rich resources, a large population and
plenty of soldiers, and is capable of sustaining a long war. Fourthly
and lastly, there is broad international support for China stemming from
the progressive and just character of her war, which is again exactly
the reverse of the meagre support for Japan's unjust cause. To sum up,
China's disadvantage lies in her military weakness, and her advantages
lie in the progressive and just character of her war, her great size and
her abundant international support. These are China's characteristics.

12. Thus it can be seen that Japan has great military, economic and
political-organizational power, but that her war is reactionary and
barbarous, her manpower and material resources are inadequate, and she
is in an unfavourable position internationally. China, on the contrary,
has less military, economic and political-organizational power, but she
is in her era of progress, her war is progressive and just, she is
moreover a big country, a factor which enables her to sustain a
protracted war, and she will be supported by most countries. The above
are the basic, mutually contradictory characteristics of the
Sino-Japanese war. They have determined and are determining all the
political policies and military strategies and tactics of the two sides;
they have determined and are determining the protracted character of the
war and its outcome, namely, that the final victory will go to China and
not to Japan. The war is a contest between these characteristics. They
will change in the course of the war, each according to its own nature;
and from this everything else will follow. These characteristics exist
objectively and are not invented to deceive people; they constitute all
the basic elements of the war, and are not incomplete fragments; they
permeate all major and minor problems on both sides and all stages of
the war, and they are not matters of no consequence. If anyone forgets
these characteristics in studying the Sino-Japanese war, he will surely
go wrong; and even though some of his ideas win credence for a time and
may seem right, they will inevitably be proved wrong by the course of
the war. On the basis of these characteristics we shall now proceed to
explain the problems to be dealt with.

REFUTATION OF THE THEORY OF NATIONAL SUBJUGATION

13. The theorists of national subjugation, who see nothing but the
contrast between the enemy's strength and our weakness, used to say,
"Resistance will mean subjugation," and now they are saying, "The
continuance of the war spells subjugation." We shall not be able to
convince them merely by stating that Japan, though strong; is small,
while China, though weak, is large. They can adduce historical
instances, such as the destruction of the Sung Dynasty by the Yuan and
the destruction of the Ming Dynasty by the Ching, to prove that small
but strong country can vanquish a large but weak one and, moreover, that
a backward country can vanquish an advanced one. If we say these events
occurred long ago and do not prove the point, they can cite the British
subjugation of India to prove that a small but strong capitalist country
can vanquish a large but weak and backward country. Therefore, we have
to produce other grounds before we can silence and convince all the
subjugationists, and supply everyone engaged in propaganda with adequate
arguments to persuade those who are still confused or irresolute and so
strengthen their faith in the War of Resistance.

14. What then are the grounds we should advance? The characteristics of
the epoch. These characteristics are concretely reflected in Japan's
retrogression and paucity of support and in China's progress and
abundance of support.

15. Our war is not just any war, it is specifically a war between China
and Japan fought in the Nineteen Thirties. Our enemy, Japan, is first of
all a moribund imperialist power; she is already in her era of decline
and is not only different from Britain at the time of the subjugation of
India, when British capitalism was still in the era of its ascendancy,
but also different from what she herself was at the time of World War I
twenty years ago. The present war was launched on the eve of the general
collapse of world imperialism and, above all, of the fascist countries;
that is the very reason the enemy has launched this adventurist war,
which is in the nature of a last desperate struggle. Therefore, it is an
inescapable certainty that it will not be China but the ruling circles
of Japanese imperialism which will be destroyed as a result of the war.
Moreover, Japan has undertaken this war at a time when many countries
have been or are about to be embroiled in war, when we are all fighting
or preparing to fight against barbarous aggression, and China's fortunes
are linked with those of most of the countries and peoples of the world.
This is the root cause of the opposition Japan has aroused and will
increasingly arouse among those countries and peoples.

16. What about China? The China of today cannot be compared with the
China of any other historical period. She is a semi-colony and a
semi-feudal society, and she is consequently considered a weak country.
But at the same time, China is historically in her era of progress; this
is the primary reason for her ability to defeat Japan. When we say that
the War of Resistance Against Japan is progressive we do not mean
progressive in the ordinary or general sense, nor do we mean progressive
in the sense that the Abyssinian war against Italy, or the Taiping
Revolution or the Revolution of 1911 were progressive, we mean
progressive in the sense that China is progressive today. In what way is
the China of today progressive? She is progressive because she is no
longer a completely feudal country and because we already have some
capitalism in China, we have a bourgeoisie and a proletariat, we have
vast numbers of people who have awakened or are awakening, we have a
Communist Party, we have a politically progressive army--the Chinese Red
Army led by the Communist Party--and we have the tradition and the
experience of many decades of revolution, and especially the experience
of the seventeen years since the founding of the Chinese Communist
Party. This experience has schooled the people and the political parties
of China and forms the very basis for the present unity against Japan.
If it is said that without the experience of 1905 the victory of 1917
would have been impossible in Russia, then we can also say that without
the experience of the last seventeen years it would be impossible to win
our War of Resistance. Such is the internal situation.

In the existing international situation, China is not isolated in the
war, and this fact too is without precedent in history. In the past,
China's wars, and India's too, were wars fought in isolation. It is only
today that we meet with world-wide popular movements, extraordinary in
breadth and depth, which have arisen or are arising and which are
supporting China. The Russian Revolution of 1917 also received
international support, and thus the Russian workers and peasants won;
but that support was not so broad in scale and deep in nature as ours
today. The popular movements in the world today are developing on a
scale and with a depth that are unprecedented. The existence of the
Soviet Union is a particularly vital factor in present-day international
politics, and the Soviet Union will certainly support China with the
greatest enthusiasm; there was nothing like this twenty years ago. All
these factors have created and are creating important conditions
indispensable to China's final victory. Large-scale direct assistance is
as yet lacking and will come only in the future, but China is
progressive and is a big country, and these are the factors enabling her
to protract the war and to promote as well as await international help.

17. There is the additional factor that while Japan is a small country
with a small territory, few resources, a small population and a limited
number of soldiers, China is a big country with vast territory, rich
resources, a large population and plenty of soldiers, so that, besides
the contrast between strength and weakness, there is the contrast
between a small country, retrogression and meagre support and a big
country, progress and abundant support. This is the reason why China
will never be subjugated. It follows from the contrast between strength
and weakness that Japan can ride roughshod over China for a certain time
and to a certain extent, that China must unavoidably travel a hard
stretch of road, and that the War of Resistance will be a protracted war
and not a war of quick decision; nevertheless, it follows from the other
contrast--a small country, retrogression and meagre support versus a big
country, progress and abundant support--that Japan cannot ride roughshod
over China indefinitely but is sure to meet final defeat, while China
can never be subjugated but is sure to win final victory.

18. Why was Abyssinia vanquished? First, she was not only weak but also
small. Second, she was not as progressive as China; she was an old
country passing from the slave to the serf system, a country without any
capitalism or bourgeois political parties, let alone a Communist Party,
and with no army such as the Chinese army, let alone one like the Eighth
Route Army. Third, she was unable to hold out and wait for international
assistance and had to fight her war in isolation. Fourth, and most
important of all, there were mistakes in the direction of her war
against Italy. Therefore Abyssinia was subjugated. But there is still
quite extensive guerrilla warfare in Abyssinia, which, if persisted in,
will enable the Abyssinians to recover their country when the world
situation changes.

19. If the subjugationists quote the history of the failure of
liberation movements in modern China to prove their assertions first
that "resistance will mean subjugation", and then that "the continuance
of the war spells subjugation", here again our answer is, "Times are
different." China herself, the internal situation in Japan and the
international environment are all different now. It is a serious matter
that Japan is stronger than before while China in her unchanged
semi-colonial and semi-feudal position is still fairly weak. It is also
a fact that for the time being Japan can still control her people at
home and exploit international contradictions in order to invade China.
But during a long war, these things are bound to change in the opposite
direction. Such changes are not yet accomplished facts, but they will
become so in future. The subjugationists dismiss this point. As for
China, we already have new people, a new political party, a new army and
a new policy of resistance to Japan, a situation very different from
that of over a decade ago, and what is more, all these will inevitably
make further progress. It is true that historically the liberation
movements met with repeated setbacks with the result that China could
not accumulate greater strength for the present War of Resistance--this
is a very painful historical lesson, and never again should we destroy
any of our revolutionary forces. Yet even on the present basis, by
exerting great efforts we can certainly forge ahead gradually and
increase the strength of our resistance. All such efforts should
converge on the great Anti-Japanese National United Front. As for
international support, though direct and large-scale assistance is not
yet in sight, it is in the making, the international situation being
fundamentally different from before. The countless failures in the
liberation movement of modern China had their subjective and objective
causes, but the situation today is entirely different. Today, although
there are many difficulties which make the War of Resistance
arduous--such as the enemy's strength and our weakness, and the fact
that his difficulties are just starting, while our own progress is far
from sufficient--nevertheless many favourable conditions exist for
defeating the enemy; we need only add our subjective efforts, and we
shall be able to overcome the difficulties and win through to victory.
These are favourable conditions such as never existed before in any
period of our history, and that is why the War of Resistance Against
Japan, unlike the liberation movements of the past, will not end in
failure.

COMPROMISE OR RESISTANCE? CORRUPTION OR PROGRESS?

20. It has been fully explained above that the theory of national
subjugation is groundless. But there are many people who do not
subscribe to this theory; they are honest patriots, who are nevertheless
deeply worried about the present situation. Two things are worrying
them, fear of a compromise with Japan and doubts about the possibility
of political progress. These two vexing questions are being widely
discussed and no key has been found to their solution. Let us now
examine them.

21. As previously explained, the question of compromise has its social
roots, and as long as these roots exist the question is bound to arise.
But compromise will not avail. To prove the point, again we need only
look for substantiation to Japan, China, and the international
situation. First take Japan. At the very beginning of the War of
Resistance, we estimated that the time would come when an atmosphere
conducive to compromise would arise, in other words, that after
occupying northern China, Kiangsu and Chekiang, Japan would probably
resort to the scheme of inducing China to capitulate. True enough, she
did resort to the scheme, but the crisis soon passed, one reason being
that the enemy everywhere pursued a barbarous policy and practiced naked
plunder. Had China capitulated, every Chinese would have become a slave
without a country. The enemy's predatory policy, the policy of
subjugating China, has two aspects, the material and the spiritual, both
of which are being applied universally to all Chinese, not only to the
people of the lower strata but also to members of the upper strata; of
course the latter are treated a little more politely, but the difference
is only one of degree, not of principle. In the main the enemy is
transplanting into the interior of China the same old measures he
adopted in the three northeastern provinces. Materially, he is robbing
the common people even of their food and clothing, making them cry out
in hunger and cold; he is plundering the means of production, thus
ruining and enslaving China's national industries. Spiritually, he is
working to destroy the national consciousness of the Chinese people.
Under the flag of the "Rising Sun" all Chinese are forced to be docile
subjects, beasts of burden forbidden to show the slightest trace of
Chinese national spirit. This barbarous enemy policy will be carried
deeper into the interior of China. Japan with her voracious appetite is
unwilling to stop the war. As was inevitable, the policy set forth in
the Japanese cabinet's statement of January 16, 1938 [11] is still being
obstinately carried out, which has enraged all strata of the Chinese
people. This rage is engendered by the reactionary and barbarous
character of Japan's war--"there is no escape from fate", and hence an
absolute hostility has crystallized. It is to be expected that on some
future occasion the enemy will once again resort to the scheme of
inducing China to capitulate and that certain subjugationists will again
crawl out and most probably collude with certain foreign elements (to be
found in Britain, the United States and France, and specially among the
upper strata in Britain) as partners in crime. But the general trend of
events will not permit capitulation; the obstinate and peculiarly
barbarous character of Japan's war has decided this aspect of the
question.

22. Second, let us take China. There are three factors contributing to
China's perseverance in the War of Resistance. In the first place the
Communist Party, which is the reliable force leading the people to
resist Japan. Next, the Kuomintang, which depends on Britain and the
United States and hence will not capitulate to Japan unless they tell it
to. Finally, the other political parties and groups, most of which
oppose compromise and support the War of Resistance. With unity among
these three, whoever compromises will be standing with the traitors, and
anybody will have the right to punish him. All those unwilling to be
traitors have no choice but to unite and carry on the War of Resistance
to the end; therefore compromise can hardly succeed.

23. Third, take the international aspect. Except for Japan's allies and
certain elements in the upper strata of other capitalist countries, the
whole world is in favour of resistance, and not of compromise by China.
This factor reinforces China's hopes. Today the people throughout the
country cherish the hope that international forces will gradually give
China increasing help. It is not a vain hope; the existence of the
Soviet Union in particular encourages China in her War of Resistance.
The socialist Soviet Union, now strong as never before, has always
shared China's joys and sorrows. In direct contrast to all the members
of the upper strata in the capitalist countries who seek nothing but
profits, the Soviet Union considers it its duty to help all weak nations
and all revolutionary wars. That China is not fighting her war in
isolation has its basis not only in international support in general but
in Soviet support in particular. China and the Soviet Union are in close
geographical proximity, which aggravates Japan's crisis and facilitates
China's War of Resistance. Geographical proximity to Japan increases the
difficulties of China's resistance. Proximity to the Soviet Union, on
the other hand, is a favourable condition for the War of Resistance.

24. Hence we may conclude that the danger of compromise exists but can
be overcome. Even if the enemy can modify his policy to some extent, he
cannot alter it fundamentally. In China the social roots of compromise
are present, but the opponents of compromise are in the majority.
Internationally, also, some forces favour compromise but the main forces
favour resistance. The combination of these three factors makes it
possible to overcome the danger of compromise and persist to the end in
the War of Resistance.

25. Let us now answer the second question. Political progress at home
and perseverance in the War of Resistance are inseparable. The greater
the political progress, the more we can persevere in the war, and the
more we persevere in the war, the greater the political progress. But,
fundamentally, everything depends on our perseverance in the War of
Resistance. The unhealthy phenomena in various herds under the
Kuomintang regime are very serious, and the accumulation of these
undesirable factors over the years has caused great anxiety and vexation
among the broad ranks of our patriots. But there is no ground for
pessimism, since experience in the War of Resistance has already proved
that the Chinese people have made as much progress in the last ten
months as in many years in the past. Although the cumulative effects of
long years of corruption are seriously retarding the growth of the
people's strength to resist Japan, thus reducing the extent of our
victories and causing us losses in the war, yet the over-all situation
in China, in Japan and in the world is such that the Chinese people
cannot but make progress. This progress will be slow because of the
factor of corruption, which impedes progress. Progress and the slow pace
of progress are two characteristics of the present situation, and the
second ill accords with the urgent needs of the war, which is a source
of great concern to patriots. But we are in the midst of a revolutionary
war, and revolutionary war is an antitoxin which not only eliminates the
enemy's poison but also purges us of our own filth. Every just,
revolutionary war is endowed with tremendous power, which can transform
many things or clear the way for their transformation. The Sino-Japanese
war will transform both China and Japan; provided China perseveres in
the War of Resistance and in the united front, the old Japan will surely
be transformed into a new Japan and the old China into a new China, and
people and everything else in both China and Japan will be transformed
during and after the war. It is proper for us to regard the
anti-Japanese war and our national reconstruction as interconnected. To
say that Japan can also be transformed is to say that the war of
aggression by her rulers will end in defeat and may lead to a revolution
by the Japanese people. The day of triumph of the Japanese people's
revolution will be the day Japan is transformed. All this is closely
linked with China's War of Resistance and is a prospect we should take
into account.

THE THEORY OF NATIONAL SUBJUGATION IS WRONG AND THE THEORY OF QUICK VICTORY IS LIKEWISE WRONG

26. In our comparative study of the enemy and ourselves with respect to
the basic contradictory characteristics, such as relative strength,
relative size, progress or reaction, and the relative extent of support,
we have already refuted the theory of national subjugation, and we have
explained why compromise is unlikely and why political progress is
possible. The subjugationists stress the contradiction between strength
and weakness and puff it up until it becomes the basis of their whole
argument on the question, neglecting all the other contradictions. Their
preoccupation with the contrast in strength shows their one-sidedness,
and their exaggeration of this one side of the matter into the whole
shows their subjectivism. Thus, if one looks at the matter as a whole,
it will be seen that they have no ground to stand on and are wrong. As
for those who are neither subjugationists nor confirmed pessimists, but
who are in a pessimistic frame of mind for the moment simply because
they are confused by the disparity between our strength and that of the
enemy at a given time and in certain respects or by the corruption in
the country, we should point out to them that their approach also tends
to be one-sided and subjective. But in their case correction is
relatively easy; once they are alerted, they will understand, for they
are patriots and their error s only momentary.

27. The exponents of quick victory are likewise wrong. Either they
completely forget the contradiction between strength and weakness,
remembering only the other contradictions, or they exaggerate China's
advantages beyond all semblance of reality and beyond recognition, or
they presumptuously take the balance of forces at one time and place for
the whole situation, as in the old saying, "A leaf before the eye shuts
out Mount Tail" In a word, they lack the courage to admit that the enemy
is strong while we are weak. They often deny this point and consequently
deny one aspect of the truth. Nor do they have the courage to admit the
limitations of our advantages, and thus they deny another aspect of the
truth. The result is that they make mistakes, big and small, and here
again it is subjectivism and one-sidedness that are doing the mischief.
These friends have their hearts in the right place, and they, too, are
patriots. But while "the gentlemen aspirations are indeed lofty", their
views are wrong, and to act according to them would certainly be to run
into a brick wall. For if appraisal does not conform to reality, action
cannot attain its objective; and to act notwithstanding would mean the
army's defeat and the nation's subjugation, so that the result would be
the same as with the defeatists. Hence this theory of quick victory will
not do either.

28. Do we deny the danger of national subjugation? No, we do not. We
recognize that China faces two possible prospects, liberation or
subjugation, and that the two are in violent conflict. Our task is to
achieve liberation and to avert subjugation. The conditions for
liberation are China's progress, which is basic, the enemy's
difficulties, and international support. We differ from the
subjugationists. Taking an objective and all-sided view, we recognize
the two possibilities of national subjugation and liberation, stress
that liberation is the dominant possibility, point out the conditions
for its achievement, and strive to secure them. The subjugationists, on
the other hand, taking a subjective and one-sided view, recognize only
one possibility, that of subjugation; they do not admit the possibility
of liberation, and still less point out the conditions necessary for
liberation or strive to secure them. Moreover, while acknowledging the
tendency to compromise and the corruption, we see other tendencies and
phenomena which, we indicate, will gradually prevail and are already in
violent conflict with the former; in addition, we point out the
conditions necessary for the healthy tendencies and phenomena to
prevail, and we strive to overcome the tendency to compromise and to
change the state of corruption. Therefore, contrary to the pessimists,
we are not at all down-hearted.

29. Not that we would not like a quick victory; everybody would be in
favour of driving the "devils" out overnight. But we point out that, in
the absence of certain definite conditions, quick victory is something
that exists only in one's mind and not in objective reality, and that it
is a mere illusion, a false theory. Accordingly, having made an
objective and comprehensive appraisal of all the circumstances
concerning both the enemy and ourselves, we point out that the only way
to final victory is the strategy of protracted war, and we reject the
groundless theory of quick victory. We maintain that we must strive to
secure all the conditions indispensable to final victory, and the more
fully and the earlier these conditions are secured, the surer we shall
be of victory and the earlier we shall win it. We believe that only in
this way can the course of the war be shortened, and we reject the
theory of quick victory, which is just idle talk and an effort to get
things on the cheap.

WHY A PROTRACTED WAR?

30. Let us now examine the problem of protracted war. A correct answer
to the question "Why a protracted war?" can be arrived at only on the
basis of all the fundamental contrasts between China and Japan. For
instance, if we say merely that the enemy is a strong imperialist power
while we are a weak semi-colonial and semi-feudal country, we are in
danger of falling into the theory of national subjugation. For neither
in theory nor in practice can a struggle become protracted by simply
pitting the weak against the strong. Nor can it become protracted by
simply pitting the big against the small, the progressive against the
reactionary, or abundant support against meagre support. The annexation
of a small country by a big one or of a big country by a small one is a
common occurrence. It often happens that a progressive country which is
not strong is destroyed by a big, reactionary country, and the same
holds for everything that is progressive but not strong. Abundant or
meagre support is an important but a subsidiary factor, and the degree
of its effect depends upon the fundamental factors on both sides.
Therefore when we say that the War of Resistance Against Japan is a
protracted war, our conclusion is derived from the interrelations of all
the factors at work on both sides. The enemy is strong and we are weak,
and the danger of subjugation is there. But in other respects the enemy
has shortcomings and we have advantages. The enemy's advantage can be
reduced and his shortcomings aggravated by our efforts. On the other
hand, our advantages can be enhanced and our shortcoming remedied by our
efforts. Hence, we can win final victory and avert subjugation, while
the enemy will ultimately be defeated and will be unable to avert the
collapse of his whole imperialist system.

31. Since the enemy has advantages only in one respect but shortcomings
in all others and we have shortcomings in only one respect but
advantages in all others, why has this produced not a balance, but, on
the contrary, a superior position for him and an inferior position for
us at the present time? Quite clearly, we cannot consider the question
in such a formal way. The fact is that the disparity between the enemy's
strength and our own is now so great that the enemy's shortcomings have
not developed, and for the time being cannot develop, to a degree
sufficient to offset his strength, while our advantages have not
developed, and for the time being cannot develop, to a degree sufficient
to compensate for our weakness. Therefore there can as yet be no
balance, only imbalance.

32. Although our efforts in persevering in the War of Resistance and the
united front have somewhat changed the enemy's strength and superiority
as against our weakness and inferiority, there has as yet been no basic
change. Hence during a certain stage of the war, to a certain degree the
enemy will be victorious and we shall suffer defeat. But why is it that
in this stage the enemy's victories and our defeats are definitely
restricted in degree and cannot be transcended by complete victory or
complete defeat? The reason is that, first, from the very beginning the
enemy's strength and our weakness have been relative and not absolute,
and that, second, our efforts in persevering in the War of Resistance
and in the united front have further accentuated this relativeness. In
comparison with the original situation, the enemy is still strong, but
unfavourable factors have reduced his strength, although not yet to a
degree sufficient to destroy his superiority, and similarly we are still
weak, but favourable factors have compensated for our weakness, although
not yet to a degree sufficient to transform our inferiority. Thus it
turns out that the enemy is relatively strong and we are relatively
weak, that the enemy is in a relatively superior and we are in a
relatively inferior position. On both sides, strength and weakness,
superiority and inferiority, have never been absolute, and besides, our
efforts in persevering in resistance to Japan and in the united front
during the war have brought about further changes in the original
balance of forces between us and the enemy. Therefore, in this stage the
enemy's victory and our defeat are definitely restricted in degree, and
hence the war becomes protracted.

33. But circumstances are continually changing. In the course of the
war, provided we employ correct military and political tactics, make no
mistakes of principle and exert our best efforts, the enemy's
disadvantages and China's advantages will both grow as the war is drawn
out, with the inevitable result that there will be a continual change in
the difference in comparative strength and hence in the relative
position of the two sides. When a new stage is reached, a great change
will take place in the balance of forces, resulting in the enemies
defeat and our victory.

34. At present the enemy can still manage to exploit his strength, and
our War of Resistance has not yet fundamentally weakened him. The
insufficiency in his manpower and material resources is not yet such as
to prevent his offensive; on the contrary, they can still sustain his
offensive to a certain extent. The reactionary and barbarous nature of
his war, a factor which intensifies both class antagonisms within Japan
and the resistance of the Chinese nation, has not yet brought about a
situation which radically impedes his advance. The enemy's international
isolation is increasing but is not yet complete. In many countries which
have indicated they will help us, the capitalists dealing in munitions
and war materials and bent solely on profit are still furnishing Japan
with large quantities of war supplies, [12] and their governments [13]
are still reluctant to join the Soviet Union in practical sanctions
against Japan. From all this it follows that our War of Resistance
cannot be won quickly and can only be a protracted war. As for China,
although there has been some improvement with regard to her weakness in
the military, economic, political and cultural spheres in the ten months
of resistance, it is still a long way from what is required to prevent
the enemy's offensive and prepare our counteroffensive. Moreover,
quantitatively speaking, we have had to sustain certain losses. Although
all the factors favourable to us are having a positive effect, it will
not be sufficient to halt the enemy's offensive and to prepare for our
counter-offensive unless we make an immense effort. Neither the
abolition of corruption and the acceleration of progress at home, nor
the curbing of the pro-Japanese forces and the expansion of the
anti-Japanese forces abroad, are yet accomplished facts. From all this
it follows that our war cannot be won quickly but can only be a
protracted war.

THE THREE STAGES OF THE PROTRACTED WAR

35. Since the Sino-Japanese war is a protracted one and final victory
will belong to China, it can reasonably be assumed that this protracted
war will pass through three stages. The first stage covers the period of
the enemy's strategic offensive and our strategic defensive. The second
stage will be the period of the enemy's strategic consolidation and our
preparation for the counter-offensive. The third stage will be the
period of our strategic counter-offensive and the enemy's strategic
retreat. It is impossible to predict the concrete situation in the three
stages, but certain main trends in the war may be pointed out in the
light of present conditions. The objective course of events will be
exceedingly rich and varied, with many twists and turns, and nobody can
cast a horoscope for the Sino-Japanese war; nevertheless it is necessary
for the strategic direction of the war to make a rough sketch of its
trends. Although our sketch may not be in full accord with the
subsequent facts and will be amended by them, it is still necessary to
make it in order to give firm and purposeful strategic direction to the
protracted war.

36. The first stage has not yet ended. The enemy's design is to occupy
Canton, Wuhan and Lanchow and link up these three points. To accomplish
this aim the enemy will have to use at least fifty divisions, or about
one and a half million men, spend from one and a half to two years, and
expend more than ten thousand million yen. In penetrating so deeply, he
will encounter immense difficulties, with consequences disastrous beyond
imagination. As for attempting to occupy the entire length of the
Canton-Hankow Railway and the Sian-Lanchow Railway, he will have to
fight perilous battles and even so may not fully accomplish his design.
But in drawing up our operational plan we should base ourselves on the
assumption that the enemy may occupy the three points and even certain
additional areas, as well as link them up, and we should make
dispositions for a protracted war, so that even if he does so, we shall
be able to cope with him. In this stage the form of fighting we should
adopt is primarily mobile warfare, supplemented by guerrilla and
positional warfare. Through the subjective errors of the Kuomintang
military authorities, positional warfare was assigned the primary role
in the first phase of this stage, but it is nevertheless supplementary
from the point of view of the stage as a whole. In this stage, China has
already built up a broad united front and achieved unprecedented unity.
Although the enemy has used and will continue to use base and shameless
means to induce China to capitulate in the attempt to realize his plan
for a quick decision and to conquer the whole country without much
effort, he has failed so far, nor is he likely to succeed in the future.
In this stage, in spite of considerable losses, China will make
considerable progress, which will become the main basis for her
continued resistance in the second stage. In the present stage the
Soviet Union has already given substantial aid to China. On the enemy
side, there are already signs of flagging morale, and his army's
momentum of attack is less in the middle phase of this stage than it was
in the initial phase, and it will diminish still further in the
concluding phase. Signs of exhaustion are beginning to appear in his
finances and economy; war-weariness is beginning to set in among his
people and troops and within the clique at the helm of the war, "war
frustrations" are beginning to manifest themselves and pessimism about
the prospects of the war is growing.

37. The second stage may be termed one of strategic stalemate. At the
tail end of the first stage, the enemy will be forced to fix certain
terminal points to his strategic offensive owing to his shortage of
troops and our firm resistance, and upon reaching them he will stop his
strategic offensive and enter the stage of safeguarding his occupied
areas. In the second stage, the enemy will attempt to safeguard the
occupied areas and to make them his own by the fraudulent method of
setting up puppet governments, while plundering the Chinese people to
the limit; but again he will be confronted with stubborn guerrilla
warfare. Taking advantage of the fact that the enemy's rear is
unguarded, our guerrilla warfare will develop extensively in the first
stage, and many base areas will be established, seriously threatening
the enemy's consolidation of the occupied areas, and so in the second
stage there will still be widespread fighting. In this stage, our form
of fighting will be primarily guerrilla warfare, supplemented by mobile
warfare. China will still retain a large regular army, but she will find
it difficult to launch the strategic counter-offensive immediately
because, on the one hand, the enemy will adopt a strategically defensive
position in the big cities and along the main lines of communication
under his occupation and, on the other hand, China will not yet be
adequately equipped technically. Except for the troops engaged in
frontal defence against the enemy, our forces will be switched in large
numbers to the enemy's rear in comparatively dispersed dispositions,
and, basing themselves on all the areas not actually occupied by the
enemy and co-ordinating with the people's local armed forces, they will
launch extensive, fierce guerrilla warfare against enemy-occupied areas,
keeping the enemy on the move as far as possible in order to destroy him
in mobile warfare, as is now being done in Shansi Province. The fighting
in the second stage will be ruthless, and the country will suffer
serious devastation. But the guerrilla warfare will be successful, and
if it is well conducted the enemy may be able to retain only about
one-third of his occupied territory, with the remaining two-thirds in
our hands, and this will constitute a great defeat for the enemy and a
great victory for China. By then the enemy-occupied territory as a whole
will fall into three categories: first, the enemy base areas; second,
our base areas for guerrilla warfare; and, third, the guerrilla areas
contested by both sides. The duration of this stage will depend on the
degree of change in the balance of forces between us and the enemy and
on the changes in the international situation; generally speaking, we
should be prepared to see this stage last a comparatively long time and
to weather its hardships. It will be a very painful period for China;
the two big problems will be economic difficulties and the disruptive
activities of the traitors. The enemy will go all out to wreck China's
united front, and the traitor organizations in all the occupied areas
will merge into a so-called "unified government". Owing to the loss of
big cities and the hardships of war, vacillating elements within our
ranks will clamour for compromise, and pessimism will grow to a serious
extent. Our tasks will then be to mobilize the whole people to unite as
one man and carry on the war with unflinching perseverance, to broaden
and consolidate the united front, sweep away all pessimism and ideas of
compromise, promote the will to hard struggle and apply new wartime
policies, and so to weather the hardships. In the second stage, we will
have to call upon the whole country resolutely to maintain a united
government, we will have to oppose splits and systematically improve
fighting techniques, reform the armed forces, mobilize the entire people
and prepare for the counter-offensive. The international situation will
become still more unfavourable to Japan and the main international
forces will incline towards giving more help to China, even though there
may be talk of "realism" of the Chamberlain type which accommodates
itself to _faits accomplis._ Japan's threat to Southeast Asia and
Siberia will become greater, and there may even be another war. As
regards Japan, scores of her divisions will be inextricably bogged down
in China. Widespread guerrilla warfare and the people's anti-Japanese
movement will wear down this big Japanese force, greatly reducing it and
also disintegrating its morale by stimulating the growth of
homesickness, war-weariness and even anti-war sentiment. Though it would
be wrong to say that Japan will achieve no results at all in her plunder
of China, yet, being short of capital and harassed by guerrilla warfare,
she cannot possibly achieve rapid or substantial results. This second
stage will be the transitional stage of the entire war; it will be the
most trying period but also the pivotal one. Whether China becomes an
independent country or is reduced to a colony will be determined not by
the retention or loss of the big cities in the first stage but by the
extent to which the whole nation exerts itself in the second. If we can
persevere in the War of Resistance, in the united front and in the
protracted war, China will in that stage gain the power to change from
weakness to strength. It will be the second act in the three-act drama
of China's War of Resistance. And through the efforts of the entire cast
it will become possible to perform a most brilliant last act.

38. The third stage will be the stage of the counter-offensive to
recover our lost territories. Their recovery will depend mainly upon the
strength which China has built up in the preceding stage and which will
continue to grow in the third stage. But China's strength alone will not
be sufficient, and we shall also have to rely on the support of
international forces and on the changes that will take place inside
Japan, or otherwise we shall not be able to win; this adds to China's
tasks in international propaganda and diplomacy. In the third stage, our
war will no longer be one of strategic defensive, but will turn into a
strategic counter-offensive manifesting itself in strategic offensives;
and it will no longer be fought on strategically interior lines, but
will shift gradually to strategically exterior lines. Not until we fight
our way to the Yalu River can this war be considered over. The third
stage will be the last in the protracted war, and when we talk of
persevering in the war to the end, we mean going all the way through
this stage. Our primary form of fighting will still be mobile warfare,
but positional warfare will rise to importance. While positional defence
cannot be regarded as important in the first stage because of the
prevailing circumstances, positional attack will become quite important
in the third stage because of the changed conditions and the
requirements of the task. In the third stage guerrilla warfare will
again provide strategic support by supplementing mobile and positional
warfare, but it will not be the primary form as in the second stage.

39. It is thus obvious that the war is protracted and consequently
ruthless in nature. The enemy will not be able to gobble up the whole of
China but will be able to occupy many places for a considerable time.
China will not be able to oust the Japanese quickly, but the greater
part of her territory will remain in her hands. Ultimately the enemy
will lose and we will win, but we shall have a hard stretch of road to
travel.

40. The Chinese people will become tempered in the course of this long
and ruthless war. The political parties taking part in the war will also
be steeled and tested. The united front must be persevered in; only by
persevering in the united front can we persevere in the war; and only by
persevering in the united front and in the war can we win final victory.
Only thus can all difficulties be overcome. After travelling the hard
stretch of road we shall reach the highway to victory. This is the
natural logic of the war.

41. In the three stages the changes in relative strength will proceed
along the following lines. In the first stage, the enemy is superior and
we are inferior in strength. With regard to our inferiority we must
reckon on changes of two different kinds from the eve of the War of
Resistance to the end of this stage. The first kind is a change for the
worse. China's original inferiority will be aggravated by war losses,
namely, decreases in territory, population, economic strength, military
strength and cultural institutions. Towards the end of the first stage,
the decrease will probably be considerable, especially on the economic
side. This point will be exploited by some people as a basis for their
theories of national subjugation and of compromise. But the second kind
of change, the change for the better, must also be noted. It includes
the experience gained in the war, the progress made by the armed forces,
the political progress, the mobilization of the people, the development
of culture in a new direction, the emergence of guerrilla warfare, the
increase in international support, etc. What is on the downgrade in the
first stage is the old quantity and the old quality, the manifestations
being mainly quantitative. What is on the upgrade is the new quantity
and the new quality, the manifestations being mainly qualitative. It is
the second kind of change that provides a basis for our ability to fight
a protracted war and win final victory.

42. In the first stage, changes of two kinds are also occurring on the
enemies side. The first kind is a change for the worse and manifests
itself in hundreds of thousands of casualties, the drain on arms and
ammunition, deterioration of troop morale, popular discontent at home,
shrinkage of trade, the expenditure of over ten thousand million yen,
condemnation by world opinion, etc. This trend also provides a basis for
our ability to fight a protracted war and win final victory. But we must
likewise reckon with the second kind of change on the enemy's side, a
change for the better, that is, his expansion in territory, population
and resources. This too is a basis for the protracted nature of our War
of Resistance and the impossibility of quick victory, but at the same
time certain people will use it as a basis for their theories of
national subjugation and of compromise. However, we must take into
account the transitory and partial character of this change for the
better on the enemy's side. Japan is an imperialist power heading for
collapse, and her occupation of China's territory is temporary. The
vigorous growth of guerrilla warfare in China will restrict her actual
occupation to narrow zones. Moreover, her occupation of Chinese
territory has created and intensified contradictions between Japan and
other foreign countries. Besides, generally speaking, such occupation
involves a considerable period in which Japan will make capital outlays
without drawing any profits, as is shown by the experience in the three
northeastern provinces. All of which again gives us a basis for
demolishing the theories of national subjugation and of compromise and
for establishing the theories of protracted war and of final victory.

43. In the second stage, the above changes on both sides will continue
to develop. While the situation cannot be predicted in detail, on the
whole Japan will continue on the downgrade and China on the upgrade.[14]
For example, Japan's military and financial resources will be seriously
drained by China's guerrilla warfare, popular discontent will grow in
Japan, the morale of her troops will deteriorate further, and she will
become more isolated internationally. As for China, she will make
further progress in the political, military and cultural spheres and in
the mobilization of the people; guerrilla warfare will develop further;
there will be some new economic growth on the basis of the small
industries and the widespread agriculture in the interior; international
support will gradually increase; and the whole picture will be quite
different from what it is now. This second stage may last quite a long
time, during which there will be a great reversal in the balance of
forces, with China gradually rising and Japan gradually declining. China
will emerge from her inferior position, and Japan will lose her superior
position; first the two countries will become evenly matched, and then
their relative positions will be reversed. Thereupon, China will in
general have completed her preparations for the strategic
counter-offensive and will enter the stage of the counter-offensive and
the expulsion of the enemy. It should be reiterated that the change from
inferiority to superiority and the completion of preparations for the
counter-offensive will involve three things, namely, an increase in
China's own strength, an increase in Japan's difficulties, and an
increase in international support; it is the combination of all these
forces that will bring about China's superiority and the completion of
her preparations for the counter-offensive.

44. Because of the unevenness in China's political and economic
development, the strategic counter-offensive of the third stage will not
present a uniform and even picture throughout the country in its initial
phase but will be regional in character, rising here and subsiding
there. During this stage, the enemy will not relax his divisive tricks
to break China's united front, hence the task of maintaining internal
unity in China will become still more important, and we shall have to
ensure that the strategic counter-offensive does not collapse halfway
through internal dissension. In this period the international situation
will become very favourable to China. China's task will be to take
advantage of it in order to attain complete liberation and establish an
independent democratic state, which at the same time will mean helping
the world anti-fascist movement.

45. China moving from inferiority to parity and then to superiority,
Japan moving from superiority to parity and then to inferiority; China
moving from the defensive to stalemate and then to the
counter-offensive, Japan moving from the offensive to the safeguarding
of her gains and then to retreat--such will be the course of the
Sino-Japanese war and its inevitable trend.

46. Hence the questions and the conclusions are as follows: Will China
be subjugated? The answer is, No, she will not be subjugated, but will
win final victory. Can China win quickly? The answer is, No, she cannot
win quickly, and the war must be a protracted one. Are these conclusions
correct? I think they are.

47. At this point, the exponents of national subjugation and of
compromise will again rush in and say, "To move from inferiority to
parity China needs a military and economic power equal to Japan's, and
to move from parity to superiority she will need a military and economic
power greater than Japan's. But this is impossible, hence the above
conclusions are not correct."

48. This is the so-called theory that "weapons decide everything",[15]
which constitutes a mechanical approach to the question of war and a
subjective and one-sided view. Our view is opposed to this; we see not
only weapons but also people. Weapons are an important factor in war,
but not the decisive factor; it is people, not things, that are
decisive. The contest of strength is not only a contest of military and
economic power, but also a contest of human power and morale. Military
and economic power is necessarily wielded by people. If the great
majority of the Chinese, of the Japanese and of the people of other
countries are on the side of our War of Resistance Against Japan, how
can Japan's military and economic power, wielded as it is by a small
minority through coercion, count as superiority? And if not, then does
not China, though wielding relatively inferior military and economic
power, become the superior? There is no doubt that China will gradually
grow in military and economic power, provided she perseveres in the War
of Resistance and in the united front. As for our enemy, weakened as he
will be by the long war and by internal and external contradictions, his
military and economic power is bound to change in the reverse direction.
In these circumstances, is there any reason why China cannot become the
superior? And that is not all. Although we cannot as yet count the
military and economic power of other countries as being openly and to
any great extent on our side, is there any reason why we will not be
able to do so in the future? If Japan's enemy is not just China, if in
future one or more other countries make open use of their considerable
military and economic power defensively or offensively against Japan and
openly help us, then will not our superiority be still greater? Japan is
a small country, her war is reactionary and barbarous, and she will
become more and more isolated internationally; China is a large country,
her war is progressive and just, and she will enjoy more and more
support internationally. Is there any reason why the long-term
development of these factors should not definitely change the relative
position between the enemy and ourselves?

49. The exponents of quick victory, however, do not realize that war is
a contest of strength, and that before a certain change has taken place
in the relative strength of the belligerents, there is no basis for
trying to fight strategically decisive battles and shorten the road to
liberation. Were their ideas to be put into practice, we should
inevitably run our heads into a brick wall. Or perhaps they are just
talking for their own pleasure without really intending to put their
ideas into practice. In the end Mr. Reality will come and pour a bucket
of cold water over these chatterers, showing them up as mere windbags
who want to get things on the cheap, to have gains without pains. We
have had this kind of idle chatter before and we have it now, though not
very much so far; but there may be more as the war develops into the
stage of stalemate and then of counter-offensive. But in the meantime,
if China's losses in the first stage are fairly heavy and the second
stage drags on very long, the theories of national subjugation and of
compromise will gain great currency. Therefore, our fire should be
directed mainly against them and only secondarily against the idle
chatter about quick victory.

50. That the war will be protracted is certain, but nobody can predict
exactly how many months or years it will last, as this depends entirely
upon the degree of the change in the balance of forces. All those who
wish to shorten the war have no alternative but to work hard to increase
our own strength and reduce that of the enemy. Specifically, the only
way is to strive to win more battles and wear down the enemy's forces,
develop guerrilla warfare to reduce enemy-occupied territory to a
minimum, consolidate and expand the united front to rally the forces of
the whole nation, build up new armies and develop new war industries,
promote political, economic and cultural progress, mobilize the workers,
peasants, businessmen, intellectuals and other sections of the people,
disintegrate the enemy forces and win over their soldiers, carry on
international propaganda to secure foreign support, and win the support
of the Japanese people and other oppressed peoples. Only by doing all
this can we reduce the duration of the war. There is no magic short-cut.

A WAR OF JIG-SAW PATTERN

51. We can say with certainty that the protracted War of Resistance
Against Japan will write a splendid page unique in the war history of
mankind. One of the special features of this war is the interlocking
"jig-saw" pattern which arises from such contradictory factors as the
barbarity of Japan and her shortage of troops on the one hand, and the
progressiveness of China and the extensiveness of her territory on the
other. There have been other wars of jig-saw pattern in history, the
three years' civil war in Russia after the October Revolution being a
case in point. But what distinguishes this war in China is its
especially protracted and extensive character, which will set a record
in history. Its jig-saw pattern manifests itself as follows.

52. _Interior and exterior lines._ The anti-Japanese war as a whole is
being fought on interior lines; but as far as the relation between the
main forces and the guerrilla units is concerned, the former are on the
interior lines while the latter are on the exterior lines, presenting a
remarkable spectacle of pincers around the enemy. The same can be said
of the relationship between the various guerrilla areas. From its own
viewpoint each guerrilla area is on interior lines and the other areas
are on exterior lines; together they form many battle fronts, which hold
the enemy in pincers. In the first stage of the war, the regular army
operating strategically on interior lines is withdrawing but the
guerrilla units operating strategically on exterior lines will advance
with great strides over wide areas to the rear of the enemy-- they will
advance even more fiercely in the second stage--thereby presenting a
remarkable picture of both withdrawal and advance.

53_. Possession and non-possession of a rear area._ The main forces,
which extend the front lines to the outer limits of the enemy's occupied
areas, are operating from the rear area of the country as a whole. The
guerrilla units, which extend the battle lines into the enemy rear, are
separated from the rear area of the country as a whole. But each
guerrilla area has a small rear of its own, upon which it relies to
establish its fluid battle lines. The case is different with the
guerrilla detachments which are dispatched by a guerrilla area for
short-term operations in the rear of the enemy in the same area; such
detachments have no rear, nor do they have a battle line. "Operating
without a rear area" is a special feature of revolutionary war in the
new era, wherever a vast territory, a progressive people, and an
advanced political party and army are to be found; there is nothing to
fear but much to gain from it, and far from having doubts about it we
should promote it.

54_. Encirclement and counter-encirclement._ Taking the war as a whole,
there is no doubt that we are strategically encircled by the enemy
because he is on the strategic offensive and operating on exterior lines
while we are on the strategic defensive and operating on interior lines.
This is the first form of enemy encirclement. We on our part can
encircle one or more of the enemy columns advancing on us along separate
routes, because we apply the policy of fighting campaigns and battles
from tactically exterior lines by using numerically preponderant forces
against these enemy columns advancing on us from strategically exterior
lines. This is the first form of our counter-encirclement of the enemy.
Next, if we consider the guerrilla base areas in the enemy's rear, each
area taken singly is surrounded by the enemy on all sides, like the
Wutai Mountains, or on three sides, like the northwestern Shansi area.
This is the second form of enemy encirclement. However, if one considers
all the guerrilla base areas together and in their relation to the
positions of the regular forces, one can see that we in turn surround a
great many enemy forces. In Shansi Province, for instance, we have
surrounded the Tatung-puchow Railway on three sides (the east and west
flanks and the southern end) and the city of Taiyuan on all sides; and
there are many similar instances in Hopei and Shantung Provinces. This
is the second form of our counter-encirclement of the enemy. Thus there
are two forms of encirclement by the enemy forces and two forms of
encirclement by our own--rather like a game of _weichi._ [16] Campaigns
and battles fought by the two sides resemble the capturing of each
other's pieces, and the establishment of enemy strongholds (such as
Talyuan) and our guerrilla base areas (such as the Wutai Mountains)
resembles moves to dominate spaces on the board. If the game of _weichi
is_ extended to include the world, there is yet a third form of
encirclement as between us and the enemy, namely, the interrelation
between the front of aggression and the front of peace. The enemy
encircles China, the Soviet Union, France and Czechoslovakia with his
front of aggression, while we counter-encircle Germany, Japan and Italy
with our front of peace. But our encirclement, like the hand of Buddha,
will turn into the Mountain of Five Elements lying athwart the Universe,
and the modern Sun Wu-kungs [17]--the fascist aggressors--will finally
be buried underneath it, never to rise again. Therefore, if on the
international plane we can create an anti-Japanese front in the Pacific
region, with China as one strategic unit, with the Soviet Union and
other countries which may join it as other strategic units, and with the
Japanese people's movement as still another strategic unit, and thus
form a gigantic net from which the fascist Sun Wu-kungs can find no
escape, then that will be our enemy's day of doom. Indeed, the day when
this gigantic net is formed will undoubtedly be the day of the complete
overthrow of Japanese imperialism. We are not jesting; this is the
inevitable trend of the war.

55_. Big areas and little areas._ There is a possibility that the enemy
will occupy the greater part of Chinese territory south of the Great
Wall, and only the smaller part will be kept intact. That is one aspect
of the situation. But within this greater part, which does not include
the three northeastern provinces, the enemy can actually hold only the
big cities, the main lines of communication and some of the
plains--which may rank first in importance, but will probably constitute
only the smaller part of the occupied territory in size and population,
while the greater part will be taken up by the guerrilla areas that will
grow up everywhere. That is another aspect of the situation. If we go
beyond the provinces south of the Great Wall and include Mongolia,
Sinkiang, Chinghai and Tibet, then the unoccupied area will constitute
the greater part of China's territory, and the enemy-occupied area will
become the smaller part, even with the three northeastern provinces.
That is yet another aspect of the situation. The area kept intact is
undoubtedly important, and we should devote great efforts to developing
it, not only politically, militarily and economically but, what is also
important, culturally. The enemy has transformed our former cultural
centres into culturally backward areas, and we on our part must
transform the former culturally backward areas into cultural centres. At
the same time, the work of developing extensive guerrilla areas behind
the enemy lines is also extremely important, and we should attend to
every aspect of this work, including the cultural. All in all, big
pieces of China's territory, namely, the rural areas, will be
transformed into regions of progress and light, while the small pieces,
namely, the enemy-occupied areas and especially the big cities, will
temporarily become regions of backwardness and darkness.

56. Thus it can be seen that the protracted and far-flung War of
Resistance Against Japan is a war of a jig-saw pattern militarily,
politically, economically and culturally. It is a marvellous spectacle
in the annals of war, a heroic undertaking by the Chinese nation, a
magnificent and earth-shaking feat. This war will not only affect China
and Japan, strongly impelling both to advance, but will also affect the
whole world, impelling all nations, especially the oppressed nations
such as India, to march forward. Every Chinese should consciously throw
himself into this war of a jig-saw pattern, for this is the form of war
by which the Chinese nation is liberating itself, the special form of
war of liberation waged by a big semi-colonial country in the Nineteen
Thirties and the Nineteen Forties.

FIGHTING FOR PERPETUAL PEACE

57. The protracted nature of China's anti-Japanese war is inseparably
connected with the fight for perpetual peace in China and the whole
world. Never has there been a historical period such as the present in
which war is so close to perpetual peace. For several thousand years
since the emergence of classes, the life of mankind has been full of
wars; each nation has fought countless wars, either internally or with
other nations. In the imperialist epoch of capitalist society, wars are
waged on a particularly extensive scale and with a peculiar
ruthlessness. The first great imperialist war of twenty years ago was
the first of its kind in history, but not the last. Only the war which
has now begun comes close to being the final war, that is, comes close
to the perpetual peace of mankind. By now one-third of the world's
population has entered the war. Look ! Italy, then Japan; Abyssinia,
then Spain, then China. The population of the countries at war now
amounts to almost 600 million, or nearly a third of the total population
of the world. The characteristics of the present war are its
uninterruptedness and its proximity to perpetual peace. Why is it
uninterrupted? After attacking Abyssinia, Italy attacked Spain, and
Germany joined in; then Japan attacked China. What will come next?
Undoubtedly Hitler will fight the great powers. "Fascism is war"
[18]--this is perfectly true. There will be no interruption in the
development of the present war into a world war; mankind will not be
able to avoid the calamity of war. Why then do we say the present war is
near to perpetual peace? The present war is the result of the
development of the general crisis of world capitalism which began with
World War I; this general crisis is driving the capitalist countries
into a new war and, above all, driving the fascist countries into new
war adventures. This war, we can foresee, will not save capitalism, but
will hasten its collapse. It will be greater in scale and more ruthless
than the war of twenty years ago, all nations will inevitably be drawn
in, it will drag on for a very long time, and mankind will suffer
greatly. But, owing to the existence of the Soviet Union and the growing
political consciousness of the people of the world, great revolutionary
wars will undoubtedly emerge from this war to oppose all
counter-revolutionary wars, thus giving this war the character of a
struggle for perpetual peace. Even if later there should be another
period of war, perpetual world peace will not be far off. Once man has
eliminated capitalism, he will attain the era of perpetual peace, and
there will be no more need for war. Neither armies, nor warships, nor
military aircraft, nor poison gas will then be needed. Thereafter and
for all time, mankind will never again know war. The revolutionary wars
which have already begun are part of the war for perpetual peace. The
war between China and Japan, two countries which have a combined
population of over 500 million, will take an important place in this war
for perpetual peace, and out of it will come the liberation of the
Chinese nation. The liberated new China of the future will be
inseparable from the liberated new world of the future. Hence our War of
Resistance Against Japan takes on the character of a struggle for
perpetual peace.

58. History shows that wars are divided into two kinds, just and unjust.
All wars that are progressive are just, and all wars that impede
progress are unjust. We Communists oppose all unjust wars that impede
progress, but we do not oppose progressive, just wars. Not only do we
Communists not oppose just wars, we actively participate in them. As for
unjust wars, World War I is an instance in which both sides fought for
imperialist interests; therefore the Communists of the whole world
firmly opposed that war. The way to oppose a war of this kind is to do
everything possible to prevent it before it breaks out and, once it
breaks out, to oppose war with war, to oppose unjust war with just war,
whenever possible. Japan's war is an unjust war that impedes progress,
and the peoples of the world, including the Japanese people, should
oppose it and are opposing it. In our country the people and the
government, the Communist Party and the Kuomintang, have all raised the
banner of righteousness in the national revolutionary war against
aggression. Our war is sacred and just, it is progressive and its aim is
peace. The aim is peace not just in one country but throughout the
world, not just temporary but perpetual peace. To achieve this aim we
must wage a life-and-death struggle, be prepared for any sacrifice,
persevere to the end and never stop short of the goal. However great the
sacrifice and however long the time needed to attain it, a new world of
perpetual peace and brightness already lies clearly before us. Our faith
in waging this war is based upon the new China and the new world of
perpetual peace and brightness for which we are striving. Fascism and
imperialism wish to perpetuate war, but we wish to put an end to it in
the not too distant future. The great majority of mankind should exert
their utmost efforts for this purpose. The 450 million people of China
constitute one quarter of the world's population, and if by their
concerted efforts they overthrow Japanese imperialism and create a new
China of freedom and equality, they will most certainly be making a
tremendous contribution to the struggle for perpetual world peace. This
is no vain hope, for the whole world is approaching this point in the
course of its social and economic development, and provided that the
majority of mankind work together, our goal will surely be attained in
several decades.

MAN'S DYNAMIC ROLE IN WAR

59.We have so far explained why the war is a protracted war and why the
final victory will be China's, and in the main dealt with what
protracted war is and what it is not. Now we shall turn to the question
of what to do and what not to do. How to conduct protracted war and how
to win the final victory? These are the questions answered below. We
shall therefore successively discuss the following problems: man's
dynamic role in war, war and politics, political mobilization for the
War of Resistance, the object of war, offence within defence, quick
decisions within a protracted war, exterior lines within interior lines,
initiative, flexibility, planning, mobile warfare, guerrilla warfare,
positional warfare, war of annihilation, war of attrition, the
possibilities of exploiting the enemy's mistakes, the question of
decisive engagements in the anti-Japanese war, and the army and the
people as the foundation of victory. Let us start with the problem of
man's dynamic role.

60. When we say we are opposed to a subjective approach to problems, we
mean that we must oppose ideas which are not based upon or do not
correspond to objective facts, because such ideas are fanciful and
fallacious and will lead to failure if acted on. But whatever is done
has to be done by human beings; protracted war and final victory will
not come about without human action. For such action to be effective
there must be people who derive ideas, principles or views from the
objective facts, and put forward plans, directives, policies, strategies
and tactics. Ideas, etc. are subjective, while deeds or actions are the
subjective translated into the objective, but both represent the dynamic
role peculiar to human beings. We term this kind of dynamic role "man's
conscious dynamic role", and it is a characteristic that distinguishes
man from all other beings. All ideas based upon and corresponding to
objective facts are correct ideas, and all deeds or actions based upon
correct ideas are correct actions. We must give full scope to these
ideas and actions, to this dynamic role. The anti-Japanese war is being
waged to drive out imperialism and transform the old China into a new
China; this can be achieved only when the whole Chinese people are
mobilized and full scope is given to their conscious dynamic role in
resisting Japan. If we just sit by and take no action, only subjugation
awaits us and there will be neither protracted war nor final victory.

61. It is a human characteristic to exercise a conscious dynamic role.
Man strongly displays this characteristic in war. True, victory or
defeat in war is decided by the military, political, economic and
geographical conditions on both sides, the nature of the war each side
is waging and the international support each enjoys, but it is not
decided by these alone; in themselves, all these provide only the
possibility of victory or defeat but do not decide the issue. To decide
the issue, subjective effort must be added, namely, the directing and
waging of war, man's conscious dynamic role in war.

62. In seeking victory, those who direct a war cannot overstep the
limitations imposed by the objective conditions; within these
limitations, however, they can and must play a dynamic role in striving
for victory. The stage of action for commanders in a war must be built
upon objective possibilities, but on that stage they can direct the
performance of many a drama, full of sound and colour, power and
grandeur. Given the objective material foundations, the commanders in
the anti-Japanese war should display their prowess and marshal all their
forces to crush the national enemy, transform the present situation in
which our country and society are suffering from aggression and
oppression, and create a new China of freedom and equality; here is
where our subjective faculties for directing war can and must be
exercised. We do not want any of our commanders in the war to detach
himself from the objective conditions and become a blundering hothead,
but we decidedly want every commander to become a general who is both
bold and sagacious. Our commanders should have not only the boldness to
overwhelm the enemy but also the ability to remain masters of the
situation throughout the changes and vicissitudes of the entire war.
Swimming in the ocean of war, they must not flounder but make sure of
reaching the opposite shore with measured strokes. Strategy and tactics,
as the laws for directing war, constitute the art of swimming in the
ocean of war.

WAR AND POLITICS

63. "War is the continuation of politics." In this sense war is politics
and war itself is a political action; since ancient times there has
never been a war that did not have a political character. The
anti-Japanese war is a revolutionary war waged by the whole nation, and
victory is inseparable from the political aim of the war--to drive out
Japanese imperialism and build a new China of freedom and
equality--inseparable from the general policy of persevering in the War
of Resistance and in the united front, from the mobilization of the
entire people, and from the political principles of the unity between
officers and men, the unity between army and people and the
disintegration of the enemy forces, and inseparable from the effective
application of united front policy, from mobilization on the cultural
front, and from the efforts to win international support and the support
of the people inside Japan. In a word, war cannot for a single moment be
separated from politics. Any tendency among the anti-Japanese armed
forces to belittle politics by isolating war from it and advocating the
idea of war as an absolute is wrong and should be corrected.

64. But war has its own particular characteristics and in this sense it
cannot be equated with politics in general. "War is the continuation of
politics by other . . . means." [19] When politics develops to a certain
stage beyond which it cannot proceed by the usual means, war breaks out
to sweep the obstacles from the way. For instance, the semi-independent
status of China is an obstacle to the political growth of Japanese
imperialism, hence Japan has unleashed a war of aggression to sweep away
that obstacle. What about China? Imperialist oppression has long been an
obstacle to China's bourgeois-democratic revolution, hence many wars of
liberation have been waged in the effort to sweep it away. Japan is now
using war for the purpose of oppressing China and completely blocking
the advance of the Chinese revolution, and therefore China is compelled
to wage the War of Resistance in her determination to sweep away this
obstacle. When the obstacle is removed, our political aim will be
attained and the war concluded. But if the obstacle is not completely
swept away, the war will have to continue till the aim is fully
accomplished. Thus anyone who seeks a compromise before the task of the
anti-Japanese war is fulfilled is bound to fail, because even if a
compromise were to occur for one reason or another, the war would break
out again, since the broad masses of the people would certainly not
submit but would continue the war until its political objective was
achieved. It can therefore be said that politics is war without
bloodshed while war is politics with bloodshed.

65. From the particular characteristics of war there arise a particular
set of organizations, a particular series of methods and a particular
kind of process. The organizations are the armed forces and everything
that goes with them. The methods are the strategy and tactics for
directing war. The process is the particular form of social activity in
which the opposing armed forces attack each other or defend themselves
against one another, employing strategy and tactics favourable to
themselves and unfavourable to the enemy. Hence war experience is a
particular kind of experience. All who take part in war must rid
themselves of their customary ways and accustom themselves to war before
they can win victory.

POLITICAL MOBILIZATION FOR THE WAR OF RESISTANCE

66. A national revolutionary war as great as ours cannot be won without
extensive and thoroughgoing political mobilization. Before the
anti-Japanese war there was no political mobilization for resistance to
Japan, and this was a great drawback, as a result of which China has
already lost a move to the enemy. After the war began, political
mobilization was very far from extensive, let alone thoroughgoing. It
was the enemy's gunfire and the bombs dropped by enemy airplanes that
brought news of the war to the great majority of the people. That was
also a kind of mobilization, but it was done for us by the enemy, we did
not do it ourselves. Even now the people in the remoter regions beyond
the noise of the guns are carrying on quietly as usual. This situation
must change, or otherwise we cannot win in our life-and-death struggle.
We must never lose another move to the enemy; on the contrary, we must
make full use of this move, political mobilization, to get the better of
him. This move is crucial; it is indeed of primary importance, while our
inferiority in weapons and other things is only secondary. The
mobilization of the common people throughout the country will create a
vast sea in which to drown the enemy, create the conditions that will
make up for our inferiority m arms and other things, and create the
prerequisites for overcoming every difficulty in the war. To win
victory, we must persevere in the War of Resistance, in the united front
and in the protracted war. But all these are inseparable from the
mobilization of the common people. To wish for victory and yet neglect
political mobilization is like wishing to "go south by driving the
chariot north", and the result would inevitably be to forfeit victory.

67. What does political mobilization mean? First, it means telling the
army and the people about the political aim of the war. It is necessary
for every soldier and civilian to see why the war must be fought and how
it concerns him. The political aim of the war is "to drive out Japanese
imperialism and build a new China of freedom and equality"; we must
proclaim this aim to everybody, to all soldiers and civilians, before we
can create an anti-Japanese upsurge and unite hundreds of millions as
one man to contribute their all to the war. Secondly, it is not enough
merely to explain the aim to them; the steps and policies for its
attainment must also be given, that is, there must be a political
programme. We already have the Ten-Point Programme for Resisting Japan
and Saving the Nation and also the Programme of Armed Resistance and
National Reconstruction; we should popularize both of them in the army
and among the people and mobilize everyone to carry them out. Without a
clear-cut, concrete political programme it is impossible to mobilize all
the armed forces and the whole people to carry the war against Japan
through to the end. Thirdly, how should we mobilize them? By word of
mouth, by leaflets and bulletins, by newspapers, books and pamphlets,
through plays and films, through schools, through the mass organizations
and through our cadres. What has been done so far in the Kuomintang
areas is only a drop in the ocean, and moreover it has been done in a
manner ill-suited to the people's tastes and in a spirit uncongenial to
them; this must be drastically changed. Fourthly, to mobilize once is
not enough; political mobilization for the War of Resistance must be
continuous. Our job is not to recite our political programme to the
people, for nobody will listen to such recitations; we must link the
political mobilization for the war with developments in the war and with
the life of the soldiers and the people, and make it a continuous
movement. This is a matter of immense importance on which our victory in
the war primarily depends.

THE OBJECT OF WAR

68. Here we are not dealing with the political aim of war; the political
aim of the War of Resistance Against Japan has been defined above as "to
drive out Japanese imperialism and build a new China of freedom and
equality". Here we are dealing with the elementary object of war, war as
"politics with bloodshed", as mutual slaughter by opposing armies. The
object of war is specifically "to preserve oneself and destroy the
enemy" (to destroy the enemy means to disarm him or "deprive him of the
power to resist", and does not mean to destroy every member of his
forces physically). In ancient warfare, the spear and the shield were
used, the spear to attack and destroy the enemy, and the shield to
defend and preserve oneself. To the present day, all weapons are still
an extension of the spear and the shield. The bomber, the machine-gun,
the long-range gun and poison gas are developments of the spear, while
the air-raid shelter, the steel helmet, the concrete fortification and
the gas mask are developments of the shield. The tank is a new weapon
combining the functions of both spear and shield. Attack is the chief
means of destroying the enemy, but defence cannot be dispensed with. In
attack the immediate object is to destroy the enemy, but at the same
time it is self-preservation, because if the enemy is not destroyed, you
will be destroyed. In defence the immediate object is to preserve
yourself, but at the same time defence is a means of supplementing
attack or preparing to go over to the attack. Retreat is in the category
of defence and is a continuation of defence, while pursuit is a
continuation of attack. It should be pointed out that destruction of the
enemy is the primary object of war and self-preservation the secondary,
because only by destroying the enemy in large numbers can one
effectively preserve oneself. Therefore attack, the chief means of
destroying the enemy, is primary, while defence, a supplementary means
of destroying the enemy and a means of self-preservation, is secondary.
In actual warfare the chief role is played by defence much of the time
and by attack for the rest of the time, but if war is taken as a whole,
attack remains primary.

69. How do we justify the encouragement of heroic sacrifice in war? Does
it not contradict "self-preservation"? No, it does not; sacrifice and
self-preservation are both opposite and complementary to each other. War
is politics with bloodshed and exacts a price, sometimes an extremely
high price. Partial and temporary sacrifice (non-preservation) is
incurred for the sake of general and permanent preservation. This is
precisely why we say that attack, which is basically a means of
destroying the enemy, also has the function of self-preservation. It is
also the reason why defence must be accompanied by attack and should not
be defence pure and simple.

70. The object of war, namely, the preservation of oneself and the
destruction of the enemy, is the essence of war and the basis of all war
activities, an essence which pervades all war activities, from the
technical to the strategic. The object of war is the underlying
principle of war, and no technical, tactical, or strategic concepts or
principles can in any way depart from it. What for instance is meant by
the principle of "taking cover and making full use of fire-power" in
shooting? The purpose of the former is self-preservation, of the latter
the destruction of the enemy. The former gives rise to such techniques
as making use of the terrain and its features, advancing in spurts, and
spreading out in dispersed formation. The latter gives rise to other
techniques, such as clearing the field of fire and organizing a
fire-net. As for the assault force, the containing force and the reserve
force in a tactical operation, the first is for annihilating the enemy,
the second for preserving oneself, and the third is for either purpose
according to circumstances--either for annihilating the enemy (in which
case it reinforces the assault force or serves as a pursuit force), or
for self-preservation (in which case it reinforces the containing force
or serves as a covering force). Thus, no technical, tactical, or
strategical principles or operations can in any way depart from the
object of war, and this object pervades the whole of a war and runs
through it from beginning to end.

71. In directing the anti-Japanese war, leaders at the various levels
must lose sight neither of the contrast between the fundamental factors
on each side nor of the object of this war. In the course of military
operations these contrasting fundamental factors unfold themselves in
the struggle by each side to preserve itself and destroy the other. In
our war we strive in every engagement to win a victory, big or small,
and to disarm a part of the enemy and destroy a part of his men and
_materiel._ We must accumulate the results of these partial destructions
of the enemy into major strategic victories and so achieve the final
political aim of expelling the enemy, protecting the motherland and
building a new China.

OFFENCE WITHIN DEFENCE, QUICK DECISIONS WITHIN A PROTRACTED WAR EXTERIOR LINES WITHIN INTERIOR LINES

72. Now let us examine the specific strategy of the War of Resistance
Against Japan. We have already said that our strategy for resisting
Japan is that of protracted war, and indeed this is perfectly right. But
this strategy is general, not specific. Specifically, how should the
protracted war be conducted? We shall now discuss this question. Our
answer is as follows. In the first and second stages of the war, _i.e._,
in the stages of the enemy's offensive and preservation of his gains, we
should conduct tactical offensives within the strategic defensive,
campaigns and battles of quick decision within the strategically
protracted war, and campaigns and battles on exterior lines within
strategically interior lines. In the third stage, we should launch the
strategic counter-offensive.

73. Since Japan is a strong imperialist power and we are a weak
semi-colonial and semi-feudal country, she has adopted the policy of the
strategic offensive while we are on the strategic defensive. Japan is
trying to execute the strategy of a war of quick decision; we should
consciously execute the strategy of protracted war. Japan is using
dozens of army divisions of fairly high combat effectiveness (now
numbering thirty) and part of her navy to encircle and blockade China
from both land and sea, and is using her air force to bomb China. Her
army has already established a long front stretching from Paotow to
Hangchow and her navy has reached Fukien and Kwangtung; thus
exterior-line operations have taken shape on a vast scale. On the other
hand, we are in the position of operating on interior lines. All this is
due to the fact that the enemy is strong while we are weak. This is one
aspect of the situation.

74. But there is another and exactly opposite aspect. Japan, though
strong, does not have enough soldiers. China, though weak, has a vast
territory, a large population and plenty of soldiers. Two important
consequences follow. First, the enemy, employing his small forces
against a vast country, can only occupy some big cities and main lines
of communication and part of the plains. Thus there are extensive areas
in the territory under his occupation which he has had to leave
ungarrisoned, and which provide a vast arena for our guerrilla warfare.
Taking China as a whole, even if the enemy manages to occupy the line
connecting Canton, Wuhan and Lanchow and its adjacent areas, he can
hardly seize the regions beyond, and this gives China a general rear and
vital bases from which to carry on the protracted war to final victory.
Secondly, in pitting his small forces against large forces, the enemy is
encircled by our large forces. The enemy is attacking us along several
routes, strategically he is on exterior lines while we are on interior
lines, strategically he is on the offensive while we are on the
defensive; all this looks very much to our disadvantage. However, we can
make use of our two advantages, namely, our vast territory and large
forces, and, instead of stubborn positional warfare, carry on flexible
mobile warfare, employing several divisions against one enemy division,
several tens of thousands of our men against ten thousand of his,
several columns against one of his columns, and suddenly encircling and
attacking a single column from the exterior lines of the battlefield. In
this way, while the enemy is on exterior lines and on the offensive in
strategic operations, he will be forced to fight on interior lines and
on the defensive in campaigns and battles. And for us, interior lines
and the defensive in strategic operations will be transformed into
exterior lines and the offensive in campaigns and battles. This is the
way to deal with one or indeed with any advancing enemy column. Both the
consequences discussed above follow from the fact that the enemy is
small while we are big. Moreover, the enemy forces, though small, are
strong (in arms and in training) while our forces, though large, are
weak (in arms and in training but not in morale), and in campaigns and
battles, therefore, we should not only employ large forces against small
and operate from exterior against interior lines, but also follow the
policy of seeking quick decisions. In general, to achieve quick
decision, we should attack a moving and not a stationary enemy. We
should concentrate a big force under cover beforehand alongside the
route which the enemy is sure to take, and while he is on the move,
advance suddenly to encircle and attack him before he knows what is
happening, and thus quickly conclude the battle. If we fight well, we
may destroy the entire enemy force or the greater part or some part of
it, and even if we do not fight so well, we may still inflict heavy
casualties. This applies to any and every one of our battles. If each
month we could win one sizable victory like that at Pinghsingkuan or
Taierhchuang, not to speak of more, it would greatly demoralize the
enemy, stimulate the morale of our own forces and evoke international
support. Thus our strategically protracted war is translated in the
field into battles of quick decision. The enemy's war of strategic quick
decision is bound to change into protracted war after he is defeated in
many campaigns and battles.

75. In a word, the above operational principle for fighting campaigns
and battles is one of "quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior
lines". It is the opposite of our strategic principle of "protracted
defensive warfare on interior lines", and yet it is the indispensable
principle for carrying out this strategy. If we should use "protracted
defensive warfare on interior lines" as the principle for campaigns and
battles too, as we did at the beginning of the War of Resistance, it
would be totally unsuited to the circumstances in which the enemy is
small while we are big and the enemy is strong while we are weak; in
that case we could never achieve our strategic objective of a protracted
war and we would be defeated by the enemy. That is why we have always
advocated the organization of the forces of the entire country into a
number of large field armies, each counterposed to one of the enemy's
field armies but having two, three or four times its strength, and so
keeping the enemy engaged in extensive theatres of war in accordance
with the principle outlined above. This principle of "quick-decision
offensive warfare on exterior lines" can and must be applied in
guerrilla as well as in regular warfare. It is applicable not only to
any one stage of the war but to its entire course. In the stage of
strategic counter-offensive, when we are better equipped technically and
are no longer in the position of the weak fighting the strong, we shall
be able to capture prisoners and booty on a large scale all the more
effectively if we continue to employ superior numbers in quick-decision
offensive battles from exterior lines. For instance, if we employ two,
three or four mechanized divisions against one mechanized enemy
division, we can be all the more certain of destroying it. It is common
sense that several hefty fellows can easily beat one.

76. If we resolutely apply "quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior
lines" on a battlefield, we shall not only change the balance of forces
on that battlefield, but also gradually change the general situation. On
the battlefield we shall be on the offensive and the enemy on the
defensive, we shall be employing superior numbers on exterior lines and
the enemy inferior numbers on interior lines, and we shall seek quick
decisions, while the enemy, try as he may, will not be able to protract
the fighting in the expectation of reinforcements; for all these
reasons, the enemy's position will change from strong to weak, from
superior to inferior, while that of our forces will change from weak to
strong, from inferior to superior. After many such battles have been
victoriously fought, the general situation between us and the enemy will
change. That is to say, through the accumulation of victories on many
battlefields by quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines, we
shall gradually strengthen ourselves and weaken the enemy, which will
necessarily affect the general balance of forces and bring about changes
in it. When that happens, these changes, together with other factors on
our side and together with the changes inside the enemy camp and a
favourable international situation, will turn the over-all situation
between us and the enemy first into one of parity and then into one of
superiority for us. That will be the time for us to launch the
counter-offensive and drive the enemy out of the country.

77. War is a contest of strength, but the original pattern of strength
changes in the course of war. Here the decisive factor is subjective
effort--winning more victories and committing fewer errors. The
objective factors provide the possibility for such change, but in order
to turn this possibility into actuality both correct policy and
subjective effort are essential. It is then that the subjective plays
the decisive role.

INITIATIVE, FLEXIBILITY AND PLANNING

78. In quick-decision offensive campaigns and battles on exterior lines,
as discussed above, the crucial point is the "offensive"; "exterior
lines" refers to the sphere of the offensive and "quick-decision" to its
duration. Hence the name "quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior
lines". It is the best principle for waging a protracted war and it is
also the principle for what is known as mobile warfare. But it cannot be
put into effect without initiative, flexibility and planning. Let us now
study these three questions.

79. We have already discussed man's conscious dynamic role, so why do we
talk about the initiative again? By conscious dynamic role we mean
conscious action and effort, a characteristic distinguishing man from
other beings, and this human characteristic manifests itself most
strongly in war; all this has been discussed already. The initiative
here means an army's freedom of action as distinguished from an enforced
loss of freedom. Freedom of action is the very life of an army and, once
it is lost, the army is close to defeat or destruction. The disarming of
a soldier is the result of his losing freedom of action through being
forced into a passive position. The same is true of the defeat of an
army. For this reason both sides in war do all they can to gain the
initiative and avoid passivity. It may be said that the quick-decision
offensive warfare on exterior lines which we advocate and the
flexibility and planning necessary for its execution are designed to
gain the initiative and thus force the enemy into a passive position and
achieve the object of preserving ourselves and destroying the enemy. But
initiative or passivity is inseparable from superiority or inferiority
in the capacity to wage war. Consequently it is also inseparable from
the correctness or incorrectness of the subjective direction of war. In
addition, there is the question of exploiting the enemy's misconceptions
and unpreparedness in order to gain the initiative and force the enemy
into passivity. These points are analysed below.

80. Initiative is inseparable from superiority in capacity to wage war,
while passivity is inseparable from inferiority in capacity to wage war.
Such superiority or inferiority is the objective basis of initiative or
passivity. It is natural that the strategic initiative can be better
maintained and exercised through a strategic offensive, but to maintain
the initiative always and everywhere, that is, to have the absolute
initiative, is possible only when there is absolute superiority matched
against absolute inferiority. When a strong, healthy man wrestles with
an invalid, he has the absolute initiative. If Japan were not riddled
with insoluble contradictions, if, for instance, she could throw in a
huge force of several million or ten million men all at once, if her
financial resources were several times what they are, if she had no
opposition from her own people or from other countries, and if she did
not pursue the barbarous policies which arouse the desperate resistance
of the Chinese people, then she would be able to maintain absolute
superiority and have the absolute initiative always and everywhere. In
history, such absolute superiority rarely appears in the early stages of
a war or a campaign but is to be found towards its end. For instance, on
the eve of Germany's capitulation in World War I, the Entente countries
became absolutely superior and Germany absolutely inferior, so that
Germany was defeated and the Entente countries were victorious; this is
an example of absolute superiority and inferiority towards the end of a
war. Again, on the eve of the Chinese victory at Taierhchuang, the
isolated Japanese forces there were reduced after bitter fighting to
absolute inferiority while our forces achieved absolute superiority, so
that the enemy was defeated and we were victorious; this is an example
of absolute superiority and inferiority towards the end of a campaign. A
war or campaign may also end in a situation of relative superiority or
of parity, in which case there is compromise in the war or stalemate in
the campaign. But in most cases it is absolute superiority and
inferiority that decide victory and defeat. All this holds for the end
of a war or a campaign, and not for the beginning. The outcome of the
Sino-Japanese war, it can be predicted, will be that Japan will become
absolutely inferior and be defeated and that China will become
absolutely superior and gain victory. But at present superiority or
inferiority is not absolute on either side, but is relative. With the
advantages of her military, economic and political-organizational power,
Japan enjoys superiority over us with our military, economic and
political-organizational weakness, which creates the basis for her
initiative. But since quantitatively her military and other power is not
great and she has many other disadvantages, her superiority is reduced
by her own contradictions. Upon her invasion of China, her superiority
has been reduced still further because she has come up against our vast
territory, large population, great numbers of troops and resolute
nation-wide resistance. Hence, Japan's general position has become one
of only relative superiority, and her ability to exercise and maintain
the initiative, which is thereby restricted, has likewise become
relative. As for China, though placed in a somewhat passive position
strategically because of her inferior strength, she is nevertheless
quantitatively superior in territory, population and troops, and also
superior in the morale of her people and army and their patriotic hatred
of the enemy; this superiority, together with other advantages, reduces
the extent of her inferiority in military, economic and other power, and
changes it into a relative strategic inferiority. This also reduces the
degree of China's passivity so that her strategic position is one of
only relative passivity. Any passivity, however, is a disadvantage, and
one must strive hard to shake it off. Militarily, the way to do so is
resolutely to wage quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines,
to launch guerrilla warfare in the rear of the enemy and so secure
overwhelming local superiority and initiative in many campaigns of
mobile and guerrilla warfare. Through such local superiority and local
initiative in many campaigns, we can gradually create strategic
superiority and strategic initiative and extricate ourselves from
strategic inferiority and passivity. Such is the interrelation between
initiative and passivity, between superiority and inferiority.

81. From this we can also understand the relationship between initiative
or passivity and the subjective directing of war. As already explained,
it is possible to escape from our position of relative strategic
inferiority and passivity, and the method is to create local superiority
and initiative in many campaigns, so depriving the enemy of local
superiority and initiative and plunging him into inferiority and
passivity. These local successes will add up to strategic superiority
and initiative for us and strategic inferiority and passivity for the
enemy. Such a change depends upon correct subjective direction. Why?
Because while we seek superiority and the initiative, so does the enemy;
viewed from this angle, war is a contest in subjective ability between
the commanders of the opposing armies in their struggle for superiority
and for the initiative on the basis of material conditions such as
military forces and financial resources. Out of the contest there emerge
a victor and a vanquished; leaving aside the contrast in objective
material conditions, the victor will necessarily owe his success to
correct subjective direction and the vanquished his defeat to wrong
subjective direction. We admit that the phenomenon of war is more
elusive and is characterized by greater uncertainty than any other
social phenomenon, in other words, that it is more a matter of
"probability". Yet war is in no way supernatural, but a mundane process
governed by necessity. That is why Sun Wu Tzu's axiom, "Know the enemy
and know yourself, and you can fight a hundred battles with no danger of
defeat", [20] remains a scientific truth. Mistakes arise from ignorance
about the enemy and about ourselves, and moreover the peculiar nature of
war makes it impossible in many cases to have full knowledge about both
sides; hence the uncertainty about military conditions and operations,
and hence mistakes and defeats. But whatever the situation and the moves
in a war, one can know their general aspects and essential points. It is
possible for a commander to reduce errors and give generally correct
direction, first through all kinds of reconnaissance and then through
intelligent inference and judgement. Armed with the weapon of "generally
correct direction", we can win more battles and transform our
inferiority into superiority and our passivity into initiative. This is
how initiative or passivity is related to the correct or incorrect
subjective direction of a war.

82. The thesis that incorrect subjective direction can change
superiority and initiative into inferiority and passivity, and that
correct subjective direction can effect a reverse change, becomes all
the more convincing when we look at the record of defeats suffered by
big and powerful armies and of victories won by small and weak armies.
There are many such instances in Chinese and foreign history. Examples
in China are the Battle of Chengpu between the states of Tsin and Chu,
[21] the Battle of Chengkao between the states of Chu and Han, [22] the
Battle in which Han Hsin defeated the Chao armies, [23] the Battle of
Kunyang between the states of Hsin and Han, [24] the Battle of Kuantu
between Yuan Shao and Tsao Tsao, [25] the Battle of Chihpi between the
states of Wu and Wei, [26] the Battle of Yiling between the states of Wu
and Shu, [27] the Battle of Feishui between the states of Chin and Tsin,
[28] etc. Among examples to be found abroad are most of Napoleon's
campaigns and the civil war in the Soviet Union after the October
Revolution. In all these instances, victory was won by small forces over
big and by inferior over superior forces. In every case, the weaker
force, pitting local superiority and initiative against the enemy's
local inferiority and passivity, first inflicted one sharp defeat on the
enemy and then turned on the rest of his forces and smashed them one by
one, thus transforming the over-all situation into one of superiority
and initiative. The reverse was the case with the enemy who originally
had superiority and held the initiative; owing to subjective errors and
internal contradictions, it sometimes happened that he completely lost
an excellent or fairly good position in which he enjoyed superiority and
initiative, and became a general without an army or a king without a
kingdom. Thus it can be seen that although superiority or inferiority in
the capacity to wage war is the objective basis determining initiative
or passivity, it is not in itself actual initiative or passivity; it is
only through a struggle, a contest of ability, that actual initiative or
passivity can emerge. In the struggle, correct subjective direction can
transform inferiority into superiority and passivity into initiative,
and incorrect subjective direction can do the opposite. The fact that
every ruling dynasty was defeated by revolutionary armies shows that
mere superiority in certain respects does not guarantee the initiative,
much less the final victory. The inferior side can wrest the initiative
and victory from the superior side by securing certain conditions
through active subjective endeavour in accordance with the actual
circumstances.

83. To have misconceptions and to be caught unawares may mean to lose
superiority and initiative. Hence, deliberately creating misconceptions
for the enemy and then springing surprise attacks upon him are two
ways--indeed two important means--of achieving superiority and seizing
the initiative. What are misconceptions? "To see every bush and tree on
Mount Pakung as an enemy soldier" [29] is an example of misconception.
And "making a feint to the east but attacking in the west" is a way of
creating misconceptions among the enemy. When the mass support is
sufficiently good to block the leakage of news, it is often possible by
various ruses to succeed in leading the enemy into a morass of wrong
judgements and actions so that he loses his superiority and the
initiative. The saying, "There can never be too much deception in war",
means precisely this. What does "being caught unawares" mean? It means
being unprepared. Without preparedness superiority is not real
superiority and there can be no initiative either. Having grasped this
point, a force which is inferior but prepared can often defeat a
superior enemy by surprise attack. We say an enemy on the move is easy
to attack precisely because he is then off guard, that is, unprepared.
These two points--creating misconceptions among the enemy and springing
surprise attacks on him-- mean transferring the uncertainties of war to
the enemy while securing the greatest possible certainty for ourselves
and thereby gaining superiority, the initiative and victory. Excellent
organization of the masses is the prerequisite for attaining all this.
Therefore it is extremely important to arouse all the people who are
opposed to the enemy, to arm themselves to the last man, make widespread
raids on the enemy and also prevent the leakage of news and provide a
screen for our own forces; in this way the enemy will be kept in the
dark about where and when our forces will attack, and an objective basis
will be created for misconceptions and unpreparedness on his part. It
was largely owing to the organized, armed masses of the people that the
weak and small force of the Chinese Red Army was able to win many
battles in the period of the Agrarian Revolutionary War. Logically, a
national war should win broader mass support than an agrarian
revolutionary war; however, as a result of past mistakes [30] the people
are in an unorganized state, cannot be promptly drawn in to serve the
cause and are sometimes even made use of by the enemy. The resolute
rallying of the people on a broad scale is the only way to secure
inexhaustible resources to meet all the requirements of the war.
Moreover, it will definitely play a big part in carrying out our tactics
of defeating the enemy by misleading him and catching him unawares. We
are not Duke Hsiang of Sung and have no use for his asinine ethics.[31]
In order to achieve victory we must as far as possible make the enemy
blind and deaf by sealing his eyes and ears and drive his commanders to
distraction by creating confusion in their minds. The above concerns the
way in which the initiative or passivity is related to the subjective
direction of the war. Such subjective direction is indispensable for
defeating Japan.

84. By and large, Japan has held the initiative in the stage of her
offensive by reason of her military power and her exploitation of our
subjective errors, past and present. But her initiative is beginning to
wane to some extent because of her many inherent disadvantages and of
the subjective errors she too has committed in the course of the war (of
which more later) and also because of our many advantages. The enemy's
defeat at Taierhchuang and his predicament in Shansi prove this clearly.
The widespread development of guerrilla warfare in the enemy's rear has
placed his garrisons in the occupied areas in a completely passive
position. Although he is still on the offensive strategically and still
holds the initiative, his initiative will end when his strategic
offensive ends. The first reason why the enemy will not be able to
maintain the initiative is that his shortage of troops renders it
impossible for him to carry on the offensive indefinitely. Our offensive
warfare in campaigns and our guerrilla warfare behind the enemy lines,
together with other factors, constitute the second reason why he will
have to cease his offensive at a certain limit and will not be able to
keep his initiative. The existence of the Soviet Union and changes in
the international situation constitute the third reason. Thus it can be
seen that the enemy's initiative is limited and can be shattered. If, in
military operations, China can keep up offensive warfare by her main
forces in campaigns and battles, vigorously develop guerrilla warfare in
the enemy's rear and mobilize the people on a broad scale politically,
we can gradually build up a position of strategic initiative.

85. Let us now discuss flexibility. What is flexibility? It is the
concrete realization of the initiative in military operations; it is the
flexible employment of armed forces. The flexible employment of armed
forces is the central task in directing a war, a task most difficult to
perform well. In addition to organizing and educating the army and the
people, the business of war consists in the employment of troops in
combat, and all these things are done to win the fight. Of course it is
difficult to organize an army, etc., but it is even more difficult to
employ it, particularly when the weak are fighting the strong. To do so
requires subjective ability of a very high order and requires the
overcoming of the confusion, obscurity and uncertainty peculiar to war
and the discovery of order, clarity and certainty in it; only thus can
flexibility in command be realized.

86. The basic principle of field operations for the War of Resistance
Against Japan is quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines.
There are various tactics or methods for giving effect to this
principle, such as dispersion and concentration of forces, diverging
advance and converging attack, the offensive and the defensive, assault
and containment, encirclement and outflanking, advance and retreat. It
is easy to understand these tactics, but not at all easy to employ and
vary them flexibly. Here the three crucial links are the time, the place
and the troops. No victory can be won unless the time, the place and the
troops are well chosen. For example, in attacking an enemy force on the
move, if we strike too early, we expose ourselves and give the enemy a
chance to prepare, and if we strike too late, the enemy may have
encamped and concentrated his forces, presenting us with a hard nut to
crack. This is the question of the time. If we select a point of assault
on the left flank which actually turns out to be the enemy's weak point,
victory will be easy; but if we select the right flank and hit a snag,
nothing will be achieved. This is the question of the place. If a
particular unit of our forces is employed for a particular task, victory
may be easy; but if another unit is employed for the same task, it may
be hard to achieve results. This is the question of the troops. We
should know not only how to employ tactics but how to vary them. For
flexibility of command the important task is to make changes such as
from the offensive to the defensive or from the defensive to the
offensive, from advance to retreat or from retreat to advance, from
containment to assault or from assault to containment, from encirclement
to outflanking or from outflanking to encirclement, and to make such
changes properly and in good time according to the circumstances of the
troops and terrain on both sides. This is true of command in campaigns
and strategic command as well as of command in battles.

87. The ancients said: "Ingenuity in varying tactics depends on mother
wit"; this "ingenuity", which is what we mean by flexibility, is the
contribution of the intelligent commander. Flexibility does not mean
recklessness; recklessness must be rejected. Flexibility consists in the
intelligent commander's ability to take timely and appropriate measures
on the basis of objective conditions after "judging the hour and sizing
up the situation" (the "situation" includes the enemy's situation, our
situation and the terrain), and this flexibility is "ingenuity in
varying tactics". On the basis of this ingenuity, we can win more
victories in quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines, change
the balance of forces in our favour, gain the initiative over the enemy,
and overwhelm and crush him so that the final victory will be ours.

88. Let us now discuss the question of planning. Because of the
uncertainty peculiar to war, it is much more difficult to prosecute war
according to plan than is the case with other activities. Yet, since
"preparedness ensures success and unpreparedness spells failure", there
can be no victory in war without advance planning and preparations.
There is no absolute certainty in war, and yet it is not without some
degree of relative certainty. We are comparatively certain about our own
situation. We are very uncertain about the enemy's, but here too there
are signs for us to read, clues to follow and sequences of phenomena to
ponder. These form what we call a degree of relative certainty, which
provides an objective basis for planning in war. Modern technical
developments (telegraphy, radio, airplanes, motor vehicles, railways,
steamships, etc.) have added to the possibilities of planning in war.
However, complete or stable planning is difficult because there is only
very limited and transient certainty in war; such planning must change
with the movement (flow or change) of the war and vary in degree
according to the scale of the war. Tactical plans, such as plans for
attack or defence by small formations or units, often have to be changed
several times a day. A plan of campaign, that is, of action by large
formations, can generally stand till the conclusion of the campaign, in
the course of which, however, it is often changed partially or sometimes
even wholly. A strategic plan based on the over-all situation of both
belligerents is still more stable, but it too is applicable only in a
given strategic stage and has to be changed when the war moves towards a
new stage. The making and changing of tactical, campaign and strategic
plans in accordance with scope and circumstance is a key factor in
directing a war; it is the concrete expression of flexibility in war, in
other words, it is also ingenuity in varying one's tactics. Commanders
at all levels in the anti-Japanese war should take note.

89. Because of the fluidity of war, some people categorically deny that
war plans or policies can be relatively stable, describing such plans or
policies as "mechanical". This view is wrong. In the preceding section
we fully recognized that, because the circumstances of war are only
relatively certain and the flow (movement or change) of war is rapid,
war plans or policies can be only relatively stable and have to be
changed or revised in good time in accordance with changing
circumstances and the flow of the war; otherwise we would become
mechanists. But one must not deny the need for war plans or policies
that are relatively stable over given periods; to negate this is to
negate everything, including the war itself as well as the negator
himself. As both military conditions and operations are relatively
stable, we must grant the relative stability of the war plans and
policies resulting from them. For example, since both the circumstances
of the war in northern China and the dispersed nature of the Eighth
Route Army's operations are relatively stable for a particular stage, it
is absolutely necessary during this stage to acknowledge the relative
stability of the Eighth Route Army's strategic principle of operation,
namely "Guerrilla warfare is basic, but lose no chance for mobile
warfare under favourable conditions." The period of validity of a plan
for a campaign is shorter than that of a strategic plan, and for a
tactical plan it is shorter still, but each is stable over a given
period. Anyone denying this point would have no way of handling warfare
and would become a relativist in war with no settled views, for whom one
course is just as wrong or just as right as another. No one denies that
even a plan valid for a given period is fluid; otherwise, one plan would
never be abandoned in favour of another. But it is fluid within limits,
fluid within the bounds of the various war operations undertaken for
carrying it out, but not fluid as to its essence; in other words it is
quantitatively but not qualitatively fluid. Within such a given period
of time, this essence is definitely not fluid, which is what we mean by
relative stability within a given period. In the great river of absolute
fluidity throughout the war there is relative stability at each
particular stretch--such is our fundamental view regarding war plans or
policies.

90. Having dealt with protracted defensive warfare on interior lines in
strategy and with quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines in
campaigns and battles, and also with the initiative, flexibility and
planning, we can now sum up briefly. The anti-Japanese war must have a
plan. War plans, which are the concrete application of strategy and
tactics, must be flexible so that they can be adapted to the
circumstances of the war. We should always seek to transform our
inferiority into superiority and our passivity into the initiative so as
to change the situation as between the enemy and ourselves. All these
find expression in quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines in
campaigns and battles and protracted defensive warfare on interior lines
in strategy.

MOBILE WARFARE, GUERRILLA WARFARE AND POSITIONAL WARFARE

91. A war will take the form of mobile warfare when its content is
quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines in campaigns and
battles within the framework of the strategy of interior lines,
protracted war and defence. Mobile warfare is the form in which regular
armies wage quick-decision offensive campaigns and battles on exterior
lines along extensive fronts and over big areas of operation. At the
same time, it includes "mobile defence", which is conducted when
necessary to facilitate such offensive battles; it also includes
positional attack and positional defence in a supplementary role. Its
characteristics are regular armies, superiority of forces in campaigns
and battles, the offensive, and fluidity.

92. China has a vast territory and an immense number of soldiers, but
her troops are inadequately equipped and trained; the enemy's forces, on
the other hand, are inadequate in number, but better equipped and
trained. In this situation, there is no doubt that we must adopt
offensive mobile warfare as our primary form of warfare, supplementing
it by others and integrating them all into mobile warfare. We must
oppose "only retreat, never advance", which is flightism, and at the
same time oppose "only advance, never retreat" which is desperate
recklessness.

93. One of the characteristics of mobile warfare is fluidity, which not
only permits but requires a field army to advance and to withdraw in
great strides. However, it has nothing in common with flightism of the
Han Fu-chu brand.[32] The primary requirement of war is to destroy the
enemy, and the other requirement is self-preservation. The object of
self-preservation is to destroy the enemy, and to destroy the enemy is
in turn the most effective means of self-preservation. Hence mobile
warfare is in no way an excuse for people like Han Pu-chu and can never
mean moving only backward, and never forward; that kind of "moving"
which negates the basic offensive character of mobile warfare would, in
practice, "move" China out of existence despite her vastness.

94. However, the other view, which we call the desperate recklessness of
"only advance, never retreat", is also wrong. The mobile warfare we
advocate, the content of which is quick-decision offensive warfare on
exterior lines in campaigns and battles, includes positional warfare in
a supplementary role, "mobile defence" and retreat, without all of which
mobile warfare cannot be fully carried out. Desperate recklessness is
military short-sightedness, originating often from fear of losing
territory. A man who acts with desperate recklessness does not know that
one characteristic of mobile warfare is fluidity, which not only permits
but requires a field army to advance and to withdraw in great strides.
On the positive side, in order to draw the enemy into a fight
unfavourable to him but favourable to us, it is usually necessary that
he should be on the move and that we should have a number of advantages,
such as favourable terrain, a vulnerable enemy, a local population that
can prevent the leakage of information, and the enemy's fatigue and
unpreparedness. This requires that the enemy should advance, and we
should not grudge a temporary loss of part of our territory. For the
temporary loss of part of our territory is the price we pay for the
permanent preservation of all our territory, including the recovery of
lost territory. On the negative side, whenever we are forced into a
disadvantageous position which fundamentally endangers the preservation
of our forces, we should have the courage to retreat, so as to preserve
our forces and hit the enemy when new opportunities arise. In their
ignorance of this principle, the advocates of desperate action will
contest a city or a piece of ground even when the position is obviously
and definitely unfavourable; as a result, they not only lose the city or
ground but fail to preserve their forces. We have always advocated the
policy of "luring the enemy in deep", precisely because it is the most
effective military policy for a weak army strategically on the defensive
to employ against a strong army.

95. Among the forms of warfare in the anti-Japanese war mobile warfare
comes first and guerrilla warfare second. When we say that in the entire
war mobile warfare is primary and guerrilla warfare supplementary, we
mean that the outcome of the war depends mainly on regular warfare,
especially in its mobile form, and that guerrilla warfare cannot
shoulder the main responsibility in deciding the outcome. It does not
follow, however, that the role of guerrilla warfare is unimportant in
the strategy of the war. Its role in the strategy of the war as a whole
is second only to that of mobile warfare, for without its support we
cannot defeat the enemy. In saying this we also have in mind the
strategic task of developing guerrilla warfare into mobile warfare.
Guerrilla warfare will not remain the same throughout this long and
cruel war, but will rise to a higher level and develop into mobile
warfare. Thus the strategic role of guerrilla warfare is twofold, to
support regular warfare and to transform itself into regular warfare.
Considering the unprecedented extent and duration of guerrilla warfare
in China's War of Resistance, it is all the more important not to
underestimate its strategic role. Guerrilla warfare in China, therefore,
has not only its tactical but also its peculiar strategic problems. I
have already discussed this in "Problems of Strategy in Guerrilla War
Against Japan". As indicated above, the forms of warfare in the three
strategic stages of the War of Resistance are as follows. In the first
stage mobile warfare is primary, while guerrilla and positional warfare
are supplementary. In the second stage guerrilla warfare will advance to
the first place and will be supplemented by mobile and positional
warfare. In the third stage mobile warfare will again become the primary
form and will be supplemented by positional and guerrilla warfare. But
the mobile warfare of the third stage will no longer be undertaken
solely by the original regular forces; part, possibly quite an important
part, will be undertaken by forces which were originally guerrillas but
which will have progressed from guerrilla to mobile warfare. From the
viewpoint of all three stages in China's War of Resistance Against
Japan, guerrilla warfare is definitely indispensable. Our guerrilla war
will present a great drama unparalleled in the annals of war. For this
reason, out of the millions of China's regular troops, it is absolutely
necessary to assign at least several hundred thousand to disperse
through all enemy-occupied areas, arouse the masses to arm themselves,
and wage guerrilla warfare in co-ordination with the masses. The regular
forces so assigned should shoulder this sacred task conscientiously, and
they should not think their status lowered because they fight fewer big
battles and for the time being do not appear as national heroes. Any
such thinking is wrong. Guerrilla warfare does not bring as quick
results or as great renown as regular warfare, but "a long road tests a
horse's strength and a long task proves a man's heart", and in the
course of this long and cruel war guerrilla warfare will demonstrate its
immense power; it is indeed no ordinary undertaking. Moreover, such
regular forces can conduct guerrilla warfare when dispersed and mobile
warfare when concentrated, as the Eighth Route Army has been doing. The
principle of the Eighth Route Army is, "Guerrilla warfare is basic, but
lose no chance for mobile warfare under favourable conditions." This
principle is perfectly correct; the views of its opponents are wrong.

96. At China's present technical level, positional warfare, defensive or
offensive, is generally impracticable, and this is where our weakness
manifests itself. Moreover, the enemy is also exploiting the vastness of
our territory to bypass our fortified positions. Hence positiona1
warfare cannot be an important, still less the principal, means for us.
But in the first and second stages of the war, it is possible and
essential, within the scope of mobile warfare, to employ localized
positional warfare in a supplementary role in campaigns. Semi-positional
"mobile defence" is a still more essential part of mobile warfare
undertaken for the purpose of resisting the enemy at every step, thereby
depleting his forces and gaining extra time. China must strive to
increase her supplies of modern weapons so that she can fully carry out
the tasks of positional attack in the stage of the strategic
counter-offensive. In this third stage positional warfare will
undoubtedly play a greater role, for then the enemy will be holding fast
to his positions, and we shall not be able to recover our lost territory
unless we launch powerful positional attacks in support of mobile
warfare. Nevertheless, in the third stage too, we must exert our every
effort to make mobile warfare the primary form of warfare. For the art
of directing war and the active role of man are largely nullified in
positional warfare such as that fought in Western Europe in the second
half of World War I. It is only natural that the war should be taken
"out of the trenches", since the war is being fought in the vast
expanses of China and since our side will remain poorly equipped
technically for quite a long time. Even during the third stage, when
China's technical position will be better, she will hardly surpass her
enemy in that respect, and so will have to concentrate on highly mobile
warfare, without which she cannot achieve final victory. Hence,
throughout the War of Resistance China will not adopt positional warfare
as primary; the primary or important forms are mobile warfare and
guerrilla warfare. These two forms of warfare will afford full play to
the art of directing war and to the active role of man-- what a piece of
good fortune out of our misfortune!

WAR OF ATTRITION AND WAR OF ANNIHILATION

97. As we have said before, the essence, or the object, of war is to
preserve oneself and destroy the enemy. Since there are three forms of
warfare, mobile, positional and guerrilla, for achieving this object,
and since they differ in degrees of effectiveness, there arises the
broad distinction between war of attrition and war of annihilation.

98. To begin with, we may say that the anti-Japanese war is at once a
war of attrition and a war of annihilation. Why? Because the enemy is
still exploiting his strength and retains strategic superiority and
strategic initiative, and therefore, unless we fight campaigns and
battles of annihilation, we cannot effectively and speedily reduce his
strength and break his superiority and initiative. We still have our
weakness and have not yet rid ourselves of strategic inferiority and
passivity; therefore, unless we fight campaigns and battles of
annihilation, we cannot win time to improve our internal and
international situation and alter our unfavourable position. Hence
campaigns of annihilation are the means of attaining the objective of
strategic attrition. In this sense war of annihilation is war of
attrition. It is chiefly by using the method of attrition through
annihilation that China can wage protracted war.

99. But the objective of strategic attrition may also be achieved by
campaigns of attrition. Generally speaking, mobile warfare performs the
task of annihilation, positional warfare performs the task of attrition,
and guerrilla warfare performs both simultaneously; the three forms of
warfare are thus distinguished from one another. In this sense war of
annihilation is different from war of attrition. Campaigns of attrition
are supplementary but necessary in protracted war.

100. Speaking theoretically and in terms of China's needs, in order to
achieve the strategic objective of greatly depleting the enemy's forces,
China in her defensive stage should not only exploit the function of
annihilation, which is fulfilled primarily by mobile warfare and
partially by guerrilla warfare, but also exploit the function of
attrition, which is fulfilled primarily by positional warfare (which
itself is supplementary) and partially by guerrilla warfare. In the
stage of stalemate we should continue to exploit the functions of
annihilation and attrition fulfilled by guerrilla and mobile warfare for
further large-scale depletion of the enemy's forces. All this is aimed
at protracting the war, gradually changing the general balance of forces
and preparing the conditions for our counter-offensive. During the
strategic counter-offensive, we should continue to employ the method of
attrition through annihilation so as finally to expel the enemy.

101. But as a matter of fact, it was our experience in the last ten
months that many or even most of the mobile warfare campaigns became
campaigns of attrition, and guerrilla warfare did not adequately fulfil
its proper function of annihilation in certain areas. The positive
aspect is that at least we depleted the enemy's forces, which is
important both for the protracted warfare and for our final victory, and
did not shed our blood in vain. But the drawbacks are first, that we did
not sufficiently deplete the enemy, and second, that we were unable to
avoid rather heavy losses and captured little war booty. Although we
should recognize the objective cause of this situation, namely, the
disparity between us and the enemy in technical equipment and in the
training of troops, in any case it is necessary, both theoretically and
practically, to urge that our main forces should fight vigorous battles
of annihilation whenever circumstances are favourable. And although our
guerrilla units have to wage battles of pure attrition in performing
specific tasks such as sabotage and harassment, it is necessary to
advocate and vigorously carry out campaigns and battles of annihilation
whenever circumstances are favourable, so as greatly to deplete the
enemy's forces and greatly replenish our own.

102. The "exterior lines", the "quick-decision" and the "offensive" in
quick-decision offensive warfare on exterior lines and the "mobility" in
mobile warfare find their main operational expression in the use of
encircling and outflanking tactics; hence the necessity for
concentrating superior forces. Therefore concentration of forces and the
use of encircling and outflanking tactics are the prerequisites for
mobile warfare, that is, for quick-decision offensive warfare on
exterior lines. All this is aimed at annihilating the enemy forces.

103. The strength of the Japanese army lies not only in its weapons but
also in the training of its officers and men--its degree of
organization, its self-confidence arising from never having been
defeated, its superstitious belief in the Mikado and in supernatural
beings, its arrogance, its contempt for the Chinese people and other
such characteristics, all of which stem from long years of
indoctrination by the Japanese warlords and from the Japanese national
tradition. This is the chief reason why we have taken very few
prisoners, although we have killed and wounded a great many enemy
troops. It is a point that has been underestimated by many people in the
past. To destroy these enemy characteristics will be a long process. The
first thing to do is to give the matter serious attention, and then
patiently and systematically to work at it in the political field and in
the fields of international propaganda and the Japanese people's
movement; in the military sphere war of annihilation is of course one of
the means. In these enemy characteristics pessimists may find a basis
for the theory of national subjugation, and passively minded military
men a basis for opposition to war of annihilation. We, on the contrary,
maintain that these strong points of the Japanese army can be destroyed
and that their destruction has already begun. The chief method of
destroying them is to win over the Japanese soldiers politically. We
should understand, rather than hurt, their pride and channel it in the
proper direction and, by treating prisoners of war leniently, lead the
Japanese soldiers to see the anti-popular character of the aggression
committed by the Japanese rulers. On the other hand, we should
demonstrate to the Japanese soldiers the indomitable spirit and the
heroic, stubborn fighting capacity of the Chinese army and the Chinese
people, that is, we should deal them blows in battles of annihilation.
Our experience in the last ten months of military operations shows that
it is possible to annihilate enemy forces--witness the Pinghsingkuan and
Taierhchuang campaigns. The Japanese army's morale is beginning to sag,
its soldiers do not understand the aim of the war, they are engulfed by
the Chinese armies and by the Chinese people, in assault they show far
less courage than the Chinese soldiers, and so on; all these are
objective factors favourable to waging battles of annihilation, and they
will, moreover, steadily develop as the war becomes protracted. From the
viewpoint of destroying the enemy's overweening arrogance through
battles of annihilation, such battles are one of the prerequisites for
shortening the war and accelerating the emancipation of the Japanese
soldiers and the Japanese people. Cats make friends with cats, and
nowhere in the world do cats make friends with mice.

104. On the other hand, it must be admitted that for the present we are
inferior to the enemy in technical equipment and in troop training.
Therefore, it is often difficult to achieve the maximum in annihilation,
such as capturing the whole or the greater part of an enemy force,
especially when fighting on the plains. In this connection the excessive
demands of the theorists of quick victory are wrong. What should be
demanded of our forces in the anti-Japanese war is that they should
fight battles of annihilation as far as possible. In favourable
circumstances, we should concentrate superior forces in every battle and
employ encircling and outflanking tactics--encircle part if not all of
the enemy forces, capture part if not all of the encircled forces, and
inflict heavy casualties on part of the encircled forces if we cannot
capture them. In circumstances which are unfavourable for battles of
annihilation, we should fight battles of attrition. In favourable
circumstances, we should employ the principle of concentration of
forces, and in unfavourable circumstances that of their dispersion. As
for the relationship of command in campaigns, we should apply the
principle of centralized command in the former and that of decentralized
command in the latter. These are the basic principles of field
operations for the War of Resistance Against Japan.

THE POSSIBILITIES OF EXPLOITING THE ENEMY'S MISTAKES

105. The enemy command itself provides a basis for the possibility of
defeating Japan. History has never known an infallible general and the
enemy makes mistakes just as we ourselves can hardly avoid making them;
hence, the possibility exists of exploiting the enemy's errors. In the
ten months of his war of aggression the enemy has already made many
mistakes in strategy and tactics. There are five major ones.

First, piecemeal reinforcement. This is due to the enemy's
underestimation of China and also to his shortage of troops. The enemy
has always looked down on us. After grabbing the four northeastern
provinces at small cost, he occupied eastern Hopei and northern Chahar,
all by way of strategic reconnaissance. The conclusion the enemy came to
was that the Chinese nation is a heap of loose sand. Thus, thinking that
China would crumble at a single blow, he mapped out a plan of "quick
decision", attempting with very small forces to send us scampering in
panic. He did not expect to find such great unity and such immense
powers of resistance as China has shown during the past ten months,
forgetting as he did that China is already in an era of progress and
already has an advanced political party, an advanced army and an
advanced people. Meeting with setbacks, the enemy then increased his
forces piecemeal from about a dozen to thirty divisions. If he wants to
advance, he will have to augment his forces still further. But because
of Japan's antagonism with the Soviet Union and her inherent shortage of
manpower and finances, there are inevitable limits to the maximum number
of men she can throw in and to the furthest extent of her advance.

Second, absence of a main direction of attack. Before the Taierhchuang
campaign, the enemy had divided his forces more or less evenly between
northern and central China and had again divided them inside each of
these areas. In northern China, for instance, he divided his forces
among the Tientsin-pukow, the Peiping-Hankow and the Tatung-Puchow
Railways, and along each of these lines he suffered some casualties and
left some garrisons in the places occupied, after which he lacked the
forces for further advances. After the Taierhchuang defeat, from which
he learned a lesson, the enemy concentrated his main forces in the
direction of Hsuchow, and so temporarily corrected this mistake.

Third, lack of strategic co-ordination. On the whole coordination exists
within the groups of enemy forces in northern China and in central
China, but there is glaring lack of coordination between the two. When
his forces on the southern section of the Tientsin-Pukow Railway
attacked Hsiaopengpu, those on the northern section made no move, and
when his forces on the northern section attacked Taierhchuang, those on
the southern section made no move. After the enemy came to grief at both
places, the Japanese minister of war arrived on an inspection tour and
the chief of general staff turned up to take charge, and for the moment,
it seemed, there was co-ordination. The landlord class, the bourgeoisie
and the warlords of Japan have very serious internal contradictions,
which are growing, and the lack of military co-ordination is one of the
concrete manifestations of this fact.

Fourth, failure to grasp strategic opportunities. This failure was
conspicuously shown in the enemy's halt after the occupation of Nanking
and Taiyuan, chiefly because of his shortage of troops and his lack of a
strategic pursuit force.

Fifth, encirclement of large, but annihilation of small, numbers. Before
the Taierhchuang campaign, in the campaigns of Shanghai, Nanking,
Tsangchow, Paoting, Nankow, Hsinkou and Linfen, many Chinese troops were
routed but few were taken prisoner, which shows the stupidity of the
enemy command.

These five errors--piecemeal reinforcement, absence of a main direction
of attack, lack of strategic co-ordination, failure to grasp
opportunities, and encirclement of large, but annihilation of small,
numbers--were all points of incompetence in the Japanese command before
the Taierhchuang campaign. Although the enemy has since made some
improvements, he cannot possibly avoid repeating his errors because of
his shortage of troops, his internal contradictions and other factors.
In addition, what he gains at one point he loses at another. For
instance, when he concentrated his forces in northern China on Hsuchow,
he left a great vacuum in the occupied areas in northern China, which
gave us full scope for developing guerrilla warfare. These mistakes were
of the enemy's own making and not induced by us. On our part, we can
deliberately make the enemy commit errors, that is, we can mislead him
and manoeuvre him into the desired position by ingenious and effective
moves with the help of a well-organized local population, for example,
by "making a feint to the east but attacking in the west". This
possibility has already been discussed. All the above shows that in the
enemy's command, too, we can find some basis for victory. Of course, we
should not take it as an important basis for our strategic planning; on
the contrary, the only reliable course is to base our planning on the
assumption that the enemy will make few mistakes. Besides, the enemy can
exploit our mistakes just as we can exploit his. It is the duty of our
command to allow him the minimum of opportunities for doing so.
Actually, the enemy command has committed errors, will again commit
errors in the future, and can be made to do so through our endeavours.
All these errors we can exploit, and it is the business of our generals
in the War of Resistance to do their utmost to seize upon them. However,
although much of the enemy's strategic and campaign command is
incompetent, there are quite a few excellent points in his battle
command, that is, in his unit and small formation tactics, and here we
should learn from him.

THE QUESTION OF DECISIVE ENGAGEMENTS IN THE ANTI-JAPANESE WAR

106. The question of decisive engagements in the anti-Japanese war
should be approached from three aspects: we should resolutely fight a
decisive engagement in every campaign or battle in which we are sure of
victory; we should avoid a decisive engagement in every campaign or
battle in which we are not sure of victory; and we should absolutely
avoid a strategically decisive engagement on which the fate of the whole
nation is staked. The characteristics differentiating our War of
Resistance Against Japan from many other wars are also revealed in this
question of decisive engagements. In the first and second stages of the
war, which are marked by the enemy's strength and our weakness, the
enemy's objective is to have us concentrate our main forces for a
decisive engagement. Our objective is exactly the opposite. We want to
choose conditions favourable to us, concentrate superior forces and
fight decisive campaigns or battles only when we are sure of victory, as
in the battles at Pinghsingkuan, Taierhchuang and other places; we want
to avoid decisive engagements under unfavourable conditions when we are
not sure of victory, this being the policy we adopted in the Changteh
and other campaigns. As for fighting a strategically decisive engagement
on which the fate of the whole nation is staked, we simply must not do
so, as witness the recent withdrawal from Hsuchow. The enemy's plan for
a "quick decision" was thus foiled, and now he cannot help fighting a
protracted war with us. These principles are impracticable in a country
with a small territory, and hardly practicable in a country that is very
backward politically. They are practicable in China because she is a big
country and is in an era of progress. If strategically decisive
engagements are avoided, then "as long as the green mountains are there,
one need not worry about firewood", for even though some of our
territory may be lost, we shall still have plenty of room for manoeuvre
and thus be able to promote and await domestic progress, international
support and the internal disintegration of the enemy; that is the best
policy for us in the anti-Japanese war. Unable to endure the arduous
trials of a protracted war and eager for an early triumph, the impetuous
theorists of quick victory clamour for a strategically decisive
engagement the moment the situation takes a slightly favourable turn. To
do what they want would be to inflict incalculable damage on the entire
war, spell finis to the protracted war, and land us in the enemy's
deadly trap; actually, it would be the worst policy. Undoubtedly, if we
are to avoid decisive engagements, we shall have to abandon territory,
and we must have the courage to do so when (and only when) it becomes
completely unavoidable. At such times we should not feel the slightest
regret, for this policy of trading space for time is correct. History
tells us how Russia made a courageous retreat to avoid a decisive
engagement and then defeated Napoleon, the terror of his age. Today
China should do likewise.

107. Are we not afraid of being denounced as "non-resisters"? No, we are
not. Not to fight at all but to compromise with the enemy -- that is
non-resistance, which should not only be denounced but must never be
tolerated. We must resolutely fight the War of Resistance, but in order
to avoid the enemy's deadly trap, it is absolutely necessary that we
should not allow our main forces to be finished off at one blow, which
would make it difficult to continue the War of Resistance--in brief, it
is absolutely necessary to avoid national subjugation. To have doubts on
this point is to be shortsighted on the question of the war and is sure
to lead one into the ranks of the subjugationists. We have criticized
the desperate recklessness of "only advance, never retreat" precisely
because, if it became the fashion, this doctrine would make it
impossible to continue the War of Resistance and would lead to the
danger of ultimate national subjugation.

108. We are for decisive engagements whenever circumstances are
favourable, whether in battles or in major or minor campaigns, and in
this respect we should never tolerate passivity. Only through such
decisive engagements can we achieve the objective of annihilating or
depleting the enemy forces, and every soldier in the anti-Japanese war
should resolutely play his part. For this purpose considerable partial
sacrifices are necessary; to avoid any sacrifice whatsoever is the
attitude of cowards and of those afflicted by the fear of Japan and must
be firmly opposed. The execution of Li Fu-ying, Han Fu-chu and other
Rightists was justified. Within the scope of correct war planning,
encouraging the spirit and practice of heroic self-sacrifice and
dauntless advance in battle is absolutely necessary and inseparable from
the waging of protracted war and the achievement of final victory. We
have strongly condemned the flightism of "only retreat, never advance"
and have supported the strict enforcement of discipline, because it is
only through heroic decisive engagements, fought under a correct plan,
that we can vanquish the powerful enemy; flightism, on the contrary,
gives direct support to the theory of national subjugation.

109. Is it not self-contradictory to fight heroically first and then
abandon territory? Will not our heroic fighters have shed their blood in
vain? That is not at all the way questions should be posed. To eat and
then to empty your bowels--is this not to eat in vain? To sleep and then
to get up--is this not to sleep in vain? Can questions be posed in such
a way? I would suppose not. To keep on eating, to keep on sleeping, to
keep on fighting heroically all the way to the Yalu River without a
stop--these are subjectivist and formalist illusions, not realities of
life. As everybody knows, although in fighting and shedding our blood in
order to gain time and prepare the counter-offensive we have had to
abandon some territory, in fact we have gained time, we have achieved
the objective of annihilating and depleting enemy forces we have
acquired experience in fighting, we have aroused hitherto inactive
people and improved our international standing. Has our blood been shed
in vain? Certainly not. Territory has been given up in order to preserve
our military forces and indeed to preserve territory, because if we do
not abandon part of our territory when conditions are unfavourable but
blindly fight decisive engagements without the least assurance of
winning, we shall lose our military forces and then be unable to avoid
the loss of all our territory; to say nothing of recovering territory
already lost. A capitalist must have capital to run his business, and if
he loses it all he is no longer a capitalist. Even a gambler must have
money to stake, and if he risks it all on a single throw and his luck
fails, he cannot gamble any more. Events have their twists and turns and
do not follow a straight line, and war is no exception; only formalists
are unable to comprehend this truth.

100. I think the same will also hold true for the decisive engagements
in the stage of strategic counter-offensive. Although by then the enemy
will be in the inferior and we in the superior position, the principle
of "fighting profitable decisive engagements and avoiding unprofitable
ones" will still apply and will continue to apply until we have fought
our way to the Yalu River. This is how we will be able to maintain our
initiative from beginning to end, and as for the enemy's "challenges"
and other people's "taunts", we should imperturbably brush them aside
and ignore them. In the War of Resistance only those generals who show
this kind of firmness can be deemed courageous and wise. This is beyond
the ken of those who "jump whenever touched". Even though we are in a
more or less passive position strategically in this first stage of the
war, we should have the initiative in every campaign; and of course we
should have the initiative throughout the later stages. We are for
protracted war and final victory, we are not gamblers who risk
everything on a single throw.

THE ARMY AND THE PEOPLE ARE THE FOUNDATION OF VICTORY

111. Japanese imperialism will never relax in its aggression against and
repression of revolutionary China; this is determined by its imperialist
nature. If China did not resist, Japan would easily seize all China
without firing a single shot, as she did the four northeastern
provinces. Since China is resisting, it is an inexorable law that Japan
will try to repress this resistance until the force of her repression is
exceeded by the force of China's resistance. The Japanese landlord class
and bourgeoisie are very ambitious, and in order to drive south to
Southeast Asia and north to Siberia, they have adopted the policy of
breaking through in the centre by first attacking China. Those who think
that Japan will know where to stop and be content with the occupation of
northern China and of Kiangsu and Chekiang Provinces completely fail to
perceive that imperialist Japan, which has developed to a new stage and
is approaching extinction, differs from the Japan of the past. When we
say that there is a definite limit both to the number of men Japan can
throw in and to the extent of her advance, we mean that with her
available strength, Japan can only commit part of her forces against
China and only penetrate China as far as their capacity allows, for she
also wants to attack in other directions and has to defend herself
against other enemies; at the same time China has given proof of
progress and capacity for stubborn resistance, and it is inconceivable
that there should be fierce attacks by Japan without inevitable
resistance by China. Japan cannot occupy the whole of China, but she
will spare no effort to suppress China's resistance in all the areas she
can reach, and will not stop until internal and external developments
push Japanese imperialism to the brink of the grave. There are only two
possible outcomes to the political situation in Japan. Either the
downfall of her entire ruling class occurs rapidly, political power
passes to the people and war thus comes to an end, which is impossible
at the moment; or her landlord class and bourgeoisie become more and
more fascist and maintain the war until the day of their downfall, which
is the very road Japan is now travelling. There can be no other outcome.
Those who hope that the moderates among the Japanese bourgeoisie will
come forward and stop the war are only harbouring illusions. The reality
of Japanese politics for many years has been that the bourgeois
moderates of Japan have fallen captive to the landlords and the
financial magnates. Now that Japan has launched war against China, so
long as she does not suffer a fatal blow from Chinese resistance and
still retains sufficient strength, she is bound to attack Southeast Asia
or Siberia, or even both. She will do so once war breaks out in Europe;
in their wishful calculations' the rulers of Japan have it worked out on
a grandiose scale. Of course, it is possible that Japan will have to
drop her original plan of invading Siberia and adopt a mainly defensive
attitude towards the Soviet Union on account of Soviet strength and of
the serious extent to which Japan herself has been weakened by her war
against China. But in that case, so far from relaxing her aggression
against China she will intensify it, because then the only way left to
her will be to gobble up the weak. China's task of persevering in the
War of Resistance, the united front and the protracted war will then
become all the more weighty, and it will be all the more necessary not
to slacken our efforts in the slightest.

112. Under the circumstances the main prerequisites for China's victory
over Japan are nation-wide unity and all-round progress on a scale ten
or even a hundred times greater than in the past. China is already in an
era of progress and has achieved a splendid unity, but her progress and
unity are still far from adequate. That Japan has occupied such an
extensive area is due not only to her strength but also to China's
weakness; this weakness is entirely the cumulative effect of the various
historical errors of the last hundred years, and especially of the last
ten years, which have confined progress to its present bounds. It is
impossible to vanquish so strong an enemy without making an extensive
and long-term effort. There are many things we have to exert ourselves
to do; here I will deal only with two fundamental aspects, the progress
of the army and the progress of the people.

113. The reform of our military system requires its modernization and
improved technical equipment, without which we cannot drive the enemy
back across the Yalu River. In our employment of troops we need
progressive, flexible strategy and tactics, without which we likewise
cannot win victory. Nevertheless, soldiers are the foundation of an
army; unless they are imbued with a progressive political spirit, and
unless such a spirit is fostered through progressive political work, it
will be impossible to achieve genuine unity between officers and men,
impossible to arouse their enthusiasm for the War of Resistance to the
full, and impossible to provide a sound basis for the most effective use
of all our technical equipment and tactics. When we say that Japan will
finally be defeated despite her technical superiority, we mean that the
blows we deliver through annihilation and attrition, apart from
inflicting losses, will eventually shake the morale of the enemy army
whose weapons are not in the hands of politically conscious soldiers.
With us, on the contrary, officers and men are at one on the political
aim of the War of Resistance. This gives us the foundation for political
work among all the anti-Japanese forces. A proper measure of democracy
should be put into effect in the army, chiefly by abolishing the feudal
practice of bullying and beating and by having officers and men share
weal and woe. Once this is done, unity will be achieved between officers
and men, the combat effectiveness of the army will be greatly increased,
and there will be no doubt of our ability to sustain the long, cruel
war.

114. The richest source of power to wage war lies in the masses of the
people. It is mainly because of the unorganized state of the Chinese
masses that Japan dares to bully us. When this defect is remedied, then
the Japanese aggressor, like a mad bull crashing into a ring of flames,
will be surrounded by hundreds of millions of our people standing
upright, the mere sound of their voices will strike terror into him, and
he will be burned to death. China's armies must have an uninterrupted
flow of reinforcements, and the abuses of press-ganging and of buying
substitutes,[33] which now exist at the lower levels, must immediately
be banned and replaced by widespread and enthusiastic political
mobilization, which will make it easy to enlist millions of men. We now
have great difficulties in raising money for the war, but once the
people are mobilized, finances too will cease to be a problem. Why
should a country as large and populous as China suffer from lack of
funds? The army must become one with the people so that they see it as
their own army. Such an army will be invincible, and an imperialist
power like Japan will be no match for it.

115. Many people think that it is wrong methods that make for strained
relations between officers and men and between the army and the people,
but I always tell them that it is a question of basic attitude (or basic
principle), of having respect for the soldiers and the people. It is
from this attitude that the various policies, methods and forms ensue.
If we depart from this attitude, then the policies, methods and forms
will certainly be wrong, and the relations between officers and men and
between the army and the people are bound to be unsatisfactory. Our
three major principles for the army's political work are, first, unity
between officers and men; second, unity between the army and the people;
and third, the disintegration of the enemy forces. To apply these
principles effectively, we must start with this basic attitude of
respect for the soldiers and the people, and of respect for the human
dignity of prisoners of war once they have laid down their arms. Those
who take all this as a technical matter and not one of basic attitude
are indeed wrong, and they should correct their view.

116. At this moment when the defence of Wuhan and other places has
become urgent, it is a task of the utmost importance to arouse the
initiative and enthusiasm of the whole army and the whole people to the
full in support of the war. There is no doubt that the task of defending
Wuhan and other places must be seriously posed and seriously performed.
But whether we can be certain of holding them depends not on our
subjective desires but on concrete conditions. Among the most important
of these conditions is the political mobilization of the whole army and
people for the struggle. If a strenuous effort is not made to secure all
the necessary conditions, indeed even if one of these conditions is
missing, disasters like the loss of Nanking and other places are bound
to be repeated. China will have her Madrids in places where the
conditions are present. So far China has not had a Madrid, and from now
on we should work hard to create several, but it all depends on the
conditions. The most fundamental of these is extensive political
mobilization of the whole army and people.

117. In all our work we must persevere in the Anti-Japanese National
United Front as the general policy. For only with this policy can we
persevere in the War of Resistance and in protracted warfare, bring
about a widespread and profound improvement in the relations between
officers and men and between the army and the people, arouse to the full
the initiative and enthusiasm of the entire army and the entire people
in the fight for the defence of all the territory still in our hands and
for the recovery of what we have lost, and so win final victory.

118. This question of the political mobilization of the army and the
people is indeed of the greatest importance. We have dwelt on it at the
risk of repetition precisely because victory is impossible without it.
There are, of course, many other conditions indispensable to victory,
but political mobilization is the most fundamental. The Anti-Japanese
National United Front is a united front of the whole army and the whole
people, it is certainly not a united front merely of the headquarters
and members of a few political parties; our basic objective in
initiating the Anti-Japanese National United Front is to mobilize the
whole army and the whole people to participate in it.

CONCLUSIONS

119. What are our conclusions? They are:

"Under what conditions do you think China can defeat and destroy the
forces of Japan?" "Three conditions are required first, the
establishment of an anti-Japanese united front in China second, the
formation of an international anti-Japanese united front; third, the
rise of the revolutionary movement of the people in Japan and the
Japanese colonies. From the standpoint of the Chinese people, the unity
of the people of China is the most important of the three conditions."

"How long do you think such a war would last?" "That depends on the
strength of China's anti-Japanese united front and many other
conditioning factors involving China and Japan."

"If these conditions are not realized quickly, the war will be
prolonged. But in the end, just the same, Japan will certainly be
defeated and China will certainly be victorious. Only the sacrifices
will be great and there will be a very painful period."

"Our strategy should be to employ our main forces to operate over an
extended and fluid front. To achieve success, the Chinese troops must
conduct their warfare with a high degree of mobility on extensive
battlefields."

"Besides employing trained armies to carry on mobile warfare, we must
organize great numbers of guerrilla units among the peasants."

"In the course of the war, China will be able to . . . reinforce the
equipment of her troops gradually. Therefore China will be able to
conduct positional warfare in the latter period of the war and make
positional attacks on the Japanese-occupied areas. Thus Japan's economy
will crack under the strain of China's long resistance and the morale of
the Japanese forces will break under the trial of innumerable battles.
On the Chinese side, however, the growing latent power of resistance
will be constantly brought into play and large numbers of revolutionary
people will be pouring into the front lines to fight for their freedom.
The combination of all these and other factors will enable us to make
the final and decisive attacks on the fortifications and bases in the
Japanese occupied areas and drive the Japanese forces of aggression out
of China." (From an interview with Edgar Snow in July 1936.)

"Thus a new stage has opened in China's political situation.... In the
present stage the central task is to mobilize all the nation's forces
for victory in the War of Resistance."

"The key to victory in the war now lies in developing the resistance
that has already begun into a war of total resistance by the whole
nation. Only through such a war of total resistance can final victory be
won."

"The existence of serious weaknesses in the War of Resistance may lead
to setbacks, retreats, internal splits, betrayals, temporary and partial
compromises and other such reverses. Therefore it should be realized
that the war will be arduous and protracted. But we are confident that,
through the efforts of our Party and the whole people, the resistance
already started will sweep aside all obstacles and continue to advance
and develop." ("Resolution on the Present Situation and the Tasks of the
Party", adopted by the Central Committee of the Communist Party of
China, August 1937.)

These are our conclusions. In the eyes of the subjugationists the enemy
are supermen and we Chinese are worthless, while in the eyes of the
theorists of quick victory we Chinese are supermen and the enemy are
worthless. Both are wrong. We take a different view; the War of
Resistance Against Japan is a protracted war, and the final victory will
be China's. These are our conclusions.

120. My lectures end here. The great War of Resistance Against Japan is
unfolding, and many people are hoping for a summary of experience to
facilitate the winning of complete victory. What I have discussed is
simply the general experience of the past ten months, and it may perhaps
serve as a kind of summary. The problem of protracted war deserves wide
attention and discussion; what I have given is only an outline, which I
hope you will examine and discuss, amend and amplify.

_NOTES_

1. This theory of national subjugation was the view held by the
Kuomintang. The Kuomintang was unwilling to resist Japan and fought
Japan only under compulsion. After the Lukouchiao Incident (July 7,
1937), the Chiang Kai-shek clique reluctantly took part in the War of
Resistance, while the Wang Ching-wei clique became the representatives
of the theory of national subjugation, was ready to capitulate to Japan
and in fact subsequently did so. However, the idea of national
subjugation not only existed in the Kuomintang, but also affected
certain sections of the middle strata of society and even certain
backward elements among the labouring people. As the corrupt and
impotent Kuomintang government lost one battle after another and the
Japanese troops advanced unchecked to the vicinity of Wuhan in the first
year of the War of Resistance, some backward people became profoundly
pessimistic.

2. These views were to be found within the Communist Party. During the
first six months of the War of Resistance, there was a tendency to take
the enemy lightly among some members of the Party, who held the view
that Japan could be defeated at a single blow. It was not that they felt
our own forces to be so strong, since they well knew that the troops and
the organized people's forces led by the Communist Party were still
small, but that the Kuomintang had begun to resist Japan. In their
opinion, the Kuomintang was quite powerful, and, in co-ordination with
the Communist Party, could deal Japan telling blows. They made this
erroneous appraisal because they saw only one aspect of the Kuomintang,
that it was resisting Japan, but overlooked the other aspect, that it
was reactionary and corrupt.

3. Such was the view of Chiang Kai-shek and company. Though they were
compelled to resist Japan, Chiang Kai-shek and the Kuomintang pinned
their hopes solely on prompt foreign aid and had no confidence in their
own strength, much less in the strength of the people.

4. Taierhchuang is a town in southern Shantung where the Chinese army
fought a battle in March 1938 against the Japanese invaders. By pitting
400,000 men against Japan's 70,000 to 80,000, the Chinese army defeated
the Japanese.

5. This view was put forward in an editorial in the _Ta King Pao,_ then
the organ of the Political Science Group in the Kuomintang. Indulging in
wishful thinking, this clique hoped that a few more victories of the
Taierhchuang type would stop Japan's advance and that there would be no
need to mobilize the people for a protracted war which would threaten
the security of its own class. This wishful thinking then pervaded the
Kuomintang as a whole.

6. For many decades, beginning with the end of the 18th century, Britain
exported an increasing quantity of opium to China. This traffic not only
subjected the Chinese people to drugging but also plundered China of her
silver. It aroused fierce opposition in China. In 1840, under the
pretext of safeguarding its trade with China, Britain launched armed
aggression against her. The Chinese troops led by Lin Tse-hsu put up
resistance, and the people in Canton spontaneously organized the
"Quell-the-British Corps", which dealt serious blows to the British
forces of aggression. In 1842, however, the corrupt Ching regime signed
the Treaty of Nanking with Britain. This treaty provided for the payment
of indemnities and the cession of Hongkong to Britain, and stipulated
that Shanghai, Foochow, Amoy, Ningpo and Canton were to be opened to
British trade and that tariff rates for British goods imported into
China were to be jointly fixed by China and Britain.

7. The Taiping Revolution, or the Movement of the Taiping Heavenly
Kingdom, was the mid-19th century revolutionary peasant movement against
the feudal rule and national oppression of the Ching Dynasty. In January
1851 Hung Hsiu-chuan, Yang Hsiu-ching and other leaders launched an
uprising in Chintien Village in Kueiping County, Kwangsi Province, and
proclaimed the founding of the Taiping Heavenly Kingdom. Proceeding
northward from Kwangsi, their peasant army attacked and occupied Hunan
and Hupoh in 1852. In 1853 it marched through Kiangsi and Anhwei and
captured Nanking. A section of the forces then continued the drive north
and pushed on to the vicinity of Tientsin. However, the Taiping army
failed to build stable base areas in the places it occupied; moreover,
after establishing its capital in Nanking, its leading group committed
many political and military errors. Therefore it was unable to withstand
the combined onslaughts of the counter-revolutionary forces of the Ching
government and the British, U.S. and French aggressors, and was finally
defeated in 1864.

8. The Reform Movement of 1898, whose leading spirits were Kang Yu-wei,
Liang Chi-chao and Tan Szu-tung, represented the interests of the
liberal bourgeoisie and the enlightened landlords. The movement was
favoured and supported by Emperor Kuang Hsu, but had no mass basis. Yuan
Shih-kai, who had an army behind him, betrayed the reformers to Empress
Dowager Tzu Hsi, the leader of the die-hards, who seized power again and
had Emperor Kuang Hsu imprisoned and Tan Szu-tung and five others
beheaded. Thus the movement ended in tragic defeat.

9. The Revolution of 1911 was the bourgeois revolution which overthrew
the autocratic regime of the Ching Dynasty. On October 10 of that year,
a section of the Ching Dynasty's New Army who were under revolutionary
influence staged an uprising in Wuchang, Hupeh Province. The existing
bourgeois and petty-bourgeois revolutionary societies and the broad
masses of the workers, peasants and soldiers responded enthusiastically,
and very soon the rule of the Ching Dynasty crumbled. In January 1912,
the Provisional Government of the Republic of China was set up in
Nanking, with Sun Yat-sen as the Provisional President. Thus China's
feudal monarchic system which had lasted for more than two thousand
years was brought to an end. The idea of a democratic republic had
entered deep in the hearts of the people. But the bourgeoisie which led
the revolution was strongly conciliationist in nature. It did not
mobilize the peasant masses on an extensive scale to crush the feudal
rule of the landlord class in the countryside, but instead handed state
power over to the Northern warlord Yuan Shih-kai under imperialist and
feudal pressure. As a result, the revolution ended in defeat.

10. The Northern Expedition was the punitive war against the Northern
warlords launched by the revolutionary army which marched north from
Kwangtung Province in May-July 1926. The Northern Expeditionary Army,
with the Communist Party of China taking part in its leadership and
under the Party's influence (the political work in the army was at that
time mostly under the charge of Communist Party members), gained the
warm support of the broad masses of workers and peasants. In the second
half of 1926 and the first half of 1927 it occupied most of the
provinces along the Yangtse and Yellow Rivers and defeated the Northern
warlords. In April 1927 this revolutionary war failed as a result of
betrayal by the reactionary clique under Chiang Kai-shek within the
revolutionary army.

11. On January 16, 1938, the Japanese cabinet declared in a policy
statement that Japan would subjugate China by force. At the same time it
tried by threats and blandishments to make the Kuomintang government
capitulate, declaring that if the Kuomintang government "continued to
plan resistance", the Japanese government would foster a new puppet
regime in China and no longer accept the Kuomintang as "the other party"
in negotiations.

12. The capitalists referred to here are chiefly those of the United
States.

13. By "their governments" Comrade Mao Tse-tung is here referring to the
governments of the imperialist countries--Britain, the United States and
France.

14. Comrade Mao Tse-tung's prediction that there would be an upswing in
China during the stage of stalemate in the War of Resistance Against
Japan was completely confirmed in the case of the Liberated Areas under
the leadership of the Chinese Communist Party. But there was actually a
decline instead of an upswing in the Kuomintang areas, because the
ruling clique headed by ChiangKai-shek was passive in resisting Japan
and active in opposing the Communist Party and the people. This roused
opposition among the broad masses of the people and raised their
political consciousness

15. According to the theory that "weapons decide everything", China
which was inferior to Japan in regard to arms was bound to be defeated
in the war. This view was current among all the leaders of the
Kuomintang reaction, Chiang Kai-shek included.

16. See "Problems of Strategy in Guerrilla War Against Japan", Note 9,
p. 112 of this volume.

17. Sun Wu-kung is the monkey king in the Chinese novel _Hsi Yu_ Chi
(_Pilgrimage to the West),_ written in the 16th century. He could cover
108,000 _li_ by turning a somersault. Yet once in the palm of the
Buddha, he could not escape from it, however many somersaults he turned.
With a flick of his palm Buddha transformed his fingers into the
five-peak Mountain of Five Elements, and buried Sun Wu-kung.

18. _"Fascism is unbridled chauvinism and predatory war,"_ said Comrade
Georgi Dimitrov in his report to the Seventh World Congress of the
Communist International in August 1935, entitled "The Fascist Offensive
and the Tasks of the Communist International" (see _Selected Articles
and Speeches_, Eng. ed., Lawrence & Wishart London, 1951, p. 44). In
July 1937, Comrade Dimitrov published an article entitled _Fascism Is
War_.

19. V. I. Lenin, _Socialism and War_, Eng. ed., FLPH, Moscow, 1950, p.
19.

20. _Sun Tzu_, Chapter 3, "The Strategy of Attack".

21. Chengpu, situated in the southwest of the present Chuancheng County
in Shantung Province, was the scene of a great battle between the states
of Tsin and Chu in 632 BC. At the beginning of the battle the Chu troops
got the upper hand. The Tsin troops, after making a retreat of 90 _li_,
chose the right and left flanks of the Chu troops, their weak spots, and
inflicted heavy defeats on them.

22. The ancient town of Chengkeo, in the northwest of the present
Chengkao County, Honan Province, was of great military importance. It
was the scene of battles fought in 203 B.C. between Liu Pang, King of
Han, and Hsiang Yu, King of Chu. At first Hsiang Yu captured Hsingyang
and Chengkao and Liu Pang's troops were almost routed. Liu Pang waited
until the opportune moment when Hsiang Yu's troops were in midstream
crossing the Szeshui River, and then crushed them and recaptured
Chengkao.

23. In 204 B.C., Han Hsin, a general of the state of Han, led his men in
a big battle with Chao Hsieh at Chinghsing. Chao Hsieh's army, said to
be 200,000 strong, was several times that of Han. Deploying his troops
with their backs to a river, Han Hsin led them in valiant combat, and at
the same time dispatched some units to attack and occupy the enemy's
weakly garrisoned rear. Caught in a pincer, Chao Hsieh's troops were
utterly defeated.

24. The ancient town of Kunyang, in the north of the present Yehhsien
County, Honan Province, was the place where Liu Hsiu, founder of the
Eastern Han Dynasty, defeated the troops of Wang Mang, Emperor of the
Hsin Dynasty, in A.D. 23. There was a huge numerical disparity between
the two sides, Liu Hsiu's forces totalling 8,000 to 9,000 men as against
Wang Mang's 400,000. But taking advantage of the negligence of Wang
Mang's generals, Wang Hsun and Wang Yi, who underestimated the enemy,
Liu Hsiu with only three thousand picked troops put Wang Mang's main
forces to rout. He followed up this victory by crushing the rest of the
enemy troops.

25. Kuantu was in the northeast of the present Chungmou County, Honan
Province, and the scene of the battle between the armies of Tsao Tsao
and Yuan Shao in A D 200. Yuan Shao had an army of 100,000, while Tsao
Tsao had only a meagre force and was short of supplies. Taking advantage
of the lack of vigilance on the part of Yuan Shao's troops, who
belittled the enemy, Tsao Tsao dispatched his light-footed soldiers to
spring a surprise attack on them and set their supplies on fire. Yuan
Shao's army was thrown into confusion and its main force wiped out.

26. The state of Wu was ruled by Sun Chuan, and the state of Wei by Tsao
Tsao. Chihpi is situated on the south bank of the Yangtse River, to the
northeast of Chisyu, Hupeh Province. In A.D. 208 Tsao Tsao led an army
of over 500,000 men, which he proclaimed to be 800,000 strong, to launch
an attack on Sun Chuan. The latter, in alliance with Tsao Tsao's
antagonist Liu Pei, mustered a force of 30,000. Knowing that Tsao Tsao's
army was plagued by epidemics and was unaccustomed to action afloat, the
allied forces of Sun Chuan and Liu Pei set fire to Tsao Tsao's fleet and
crushed his army.

27. Yiling, to the east of the present Ichang, Hupeh Province, was the
place where Lu Sun, a general of the state of Wu, defeated the army of
Liu Pei, ruler of Shu, in A D. 222. Liu Pei's troops scored successive
victories at the beginning of the war and penetrated five or six hundred
_li_ into the territory of Wu as far as Yiling. Lu Sun, who was
defending Yiling, avoided battle for over seven months until Liu Pei
"was at his wits' end and his troops were exhausted and demoralized".
Then he crushed Liu Pei's troops by taking advantage of a favourable
wind to set fire to their tents.

28. Hsieh Hsuan, a general of Eastern Tsin Dynasty, defeated Fu Chien,
ruler of the state of Chin, in AD 383 at the Feishui River in Anhwei
Province. Fu Chien had an infantry force of more than 600,000, a cavalry
force of 270,000 and a guards corps of more than 30,000, while the land
and river forces of Eastern Tsin numbered only 80,000. When the armies
lined up on opposite banks of the Feishui River, Hsieh Hsuan, taking
advantage of the overconfidence and conceit of the enemy troops,
requested Fu Chien to move his troops back so as to leave room for the
Eastern Tsin troops to cross the river and fight it out. Fu Chien
complied, but when he ordered withdrawal, his troops got into a panic
and could not be stopped. Seizing the opportunity, the Eastern Tsin
troops crossed the river, launched an offensive and crushed the enemy.

29. In A.D. 383, Fu Chien, the ruler of the state of Chin, belittled the
forces of Tsin and attacked them. The Tsin troops defeated the enemy's
advance units at Lochien, Shouyang County, Anhwei Province, and pushed
forward by land and water. Ascending the city wall of Shonyang, Fu Chien
observed the excellent alignment of the Tsin troops and, mistaking the
woods and bushes on Mount Pakung for enemy soldiers, was frightened by
the enemy's apparent strength.

30. Comrade Mao Tse-tung is here referring to the fact that Chiang
Kai-shek and Wang Ching-wei, having betrayed the first national
democratic united front of the Kuomintang and the Communist Party in
1927, launched a ten-year war against the people, and thus made it
impossible for the Chinese people to be organized on a large scale. For
this the Kuomintang reactionaries headed by Chiang Kai-shek must be held
responsible.

31. Duke Hsiang of Sung ruled in the Spring and Autumn Era. In 638 BC,
the state of Sung fought with the powerful state of Chu. The Sung forces
were already deployed in battle positions when the Chu troops were
crossing the river. One of the Sung officers suggested that, as the Chu
troops were numerically stronger, this was the moment for attack. But
the Duke said, "No, a gentleman should never attack one who is
unprepared." When the Chu troops had crossed the river but had not yet
completed their battle alignment, the officer again proposed an
immediate aback, and once again the Duke said, "No, a gentleman should
never attack an army which has not yet completed its battle alignment."
The Duke gave the order for attack on after the Chu troops were fully
prepared. As a result, the Sung troops met with disastrous defeat and
the Duke himself was wounded.

32. Han Pu-chu, a Kuomintang warlord, was for several years governor of
Shantun. When the Japanese invaders thrust southward to Shantung along
the Tientsin-Pukow Railway after occupying Peiping and Tientsin in 1937,
Han Fu-chu fled all the was from Shantung to Honan without fighting a
single battle.

33. The Kuomintang expanded its army by press-ganging. Its military and
police seized people everywhere, roping them up and treating them like
convicts. Those who had money would bribe the Kuomintang officials or
pay for substitutes.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Transcription by the Maoist Documentation Project.
HTML revised 2004 by Marxists.org

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Selected Works of Mao Tse-tung

Save
